Nevada, session 83, AB601.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 232 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in NRS 232.8413 and 232.8415 and sections
2 to 16, inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise requires,
the words and terms defined in sections 3 and 4 of this act have
the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Deputy Director” means the Deputy Director of the
Office.
Sec. 4. “Office” means the Office of Nevada Boards,
Commissions and Councils Standards of the Department created
by NRS 232.8413.
Sec. 5. 1. The Director may appoint a General Counsel of
the Office and as many deputies to the General Counsel as the
Director deems necessary to carry out the duties and functions of
the Office.
2. The General Counsel and each deputy appointed pursuant
to subsection 1:
(a) Are in the unclassified service of the State.
(b) Must be attorneys in good standing licensed and admitted
to practice law in this State.
-
*AB601*

– 4 –
(c) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 7.065, shall not
engage in the private practice of law.
3. The Director may retain an attorney other than the
General Counsel or a deputy appointed pursuant to subsection 1 if
the Director determines that it is impracticable, uneconomical or
could constitute a conflict of interest for the legal service to be
rendered by the General Counsel or a deputy.
Sec. 6. 1. The Office shall periodically conduct a review of
each board, commission, council and similar body in this State
within the Executive Department of the State Government which
is not provided for in the Nevada Constitution or established by an
executive order of the Governor to determine whether the board,
commission, council or similar body should be terminated,
modified, consolidated with another board, commission, council or
similar body or continued.
2. A review conducted pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
(a) An evaluation of the:
(1) Effectiveness and relevance of the board, commission,
council or similar body.
(2) Usefulness and performance of the board, commission,
council or similar body.
(3) Cost and resource utilization of the board, commission,
council or similar body.
(4) Amount and quality of stakeholder and public
engagement of the board, commission, council or similar body.
(b) A comparative analysis between the board, commission,
council or similar body and other comparable boards,
commissions, councils or similar bodies.
3. A board, commission, council or similar body shall
cooperate with the Office in the conducting of a review pursuant
to subsection 1 and shall submit to the Office, upon request, any
information the Office deems necessary for the conducting of the
review.
4. A board, commission, council or similar body subject to a
review by the Office has the burden of proving that its continuing
existence is justified.
Sec. 7. The Office shall establish a schedule for conducting
reviews pursuant to section 6 of this act. The schedule must ensure
that any board, commission, council or similar body that is
scheduled to terminate on a particular date is reviewed before that
date.
Sec. 8. At the conclusion of a review conducted pursuant to
section 6 of this act, the Deputy Director shall submit to the
Governor a recommendation as to whether the board, commission,
-
*AB601*

– 5 –
council or similar body should be terminated, modified,
consolidated with another board, commission, council or similar
body or continued. The Governor shall, if necessary, request the
drafting of a legislative measure pursuant to NRS 218D.175 to
effectuate the recommendation.
Sec. 9. 1. The Office may, by regulation, establish
procedures and requirements relating to the appointment of
members to a professional or occupational licensing board under
the purview of the Office pursuant to NRS 232.8415.
2. The Office shall require any professional or occupational
licensing board under the purview of the Office pursuant to NRS
232.8415, before entering into a contract of any kind, to submit
the contract to and obtain the approval of the Office.
Sec. 10. 1. The Office shall provide to each professional
and occupational licensing board under its purview pursuant to
NRS 232.8415 administrative services, including, without
limitation:
(a) Accounting services; and
(b) Information technology services.
2. A professional or occupational licensing board under the
purview of the Office pursuant to NRS 232.8415 may use the
services of a hearing officer employed by the Office to adjudicate a
contested case before the board.
3. The Office shall, by regulation:
(a) Prescribe a fee to cover the costs incurred by the Office for
any service provided by the Office pursuant to subsection 1 or 2;
(b) Adopt such procedures as the Office may deem appropriate
for the billing or collection of such fees from a professional or
occupational licensing board to which such a service is provided;
and
(c) Establish procedures to provide to each professional and
occupational licensing board which has paid a fee prescribed
pursuant to paragraph (a) a portion of any money in the Account
that is unexpended at the end of a fiscal year.
4. A professional or occupational licensing board under the
purview of the Office pursuant to NRS 232.8415 may not pay any
compensation to a natural person or entity other than the Office
for a service that the Office provides pursuant to subsection 1.
5. Any money the Office receives pursuant to this section
must be deposited in the State Treasury for credit to the Account.
6. As used in this section, “Account” means the Office of
Nevada Boards, Commissions and Councils Standards Account
created by section 11 of this act.
Sec. 11. 1. The Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and
Councils Standards Account is hereby created in the State General
-
*AB601*

– 6 –
Fund. The Account must be administered by the Deputy Director
and may be expended only to carry out the provisions of NRS
232.8413 and 232.8415 and sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act.
2. The interest and income earned on the money in the
Account, after deducting applicable charges, must be credited to
the Account.
3. Any money in the Account and any unexpended
appropriations made to the Account from the State General Fund
remaining at the end of a fiscal year do not revert to the State
General Fund, and the balance in the Account must be carried
forward to the next fiscal year.
4. The Deputy Director may apply for and accept any gift,
grant, donation or appropriation for deposit in the Account.
Sec. 12. A professional or occupational licensing board
under the purview of the Office pursuant to NRS 232.8415 that
intends to request that any person or governmental entity submit
to the Legislative Counsel a request for the drafting of a legislative
measure on behalf of the professional or occupational licensing
board shall provide notice of that fact to the Deputy Director in a
form and manner prescribed by the Office.
Sec. 13. 1. The Office shall maintain an Internet website
through which any professional or occupational licensing board
under its purview pursuant to NRS 232.8415 may post
information.
2. A professional or occupational licensing board under the
purview of the Office pursuant to NRS 232.8415 shall post
information only on the Internet website maintained pursuant to
subsection 1 and may not post information on any other Internet
website.
Sec. 14. The Office may:
1. Have access to, inspect, copy and subpoena all records in
the possession of any clerk of a court, law enforcement agency or
public or private institution, wherever situated, that relate to its
duties.
2. Have access to all written records in the possession of any
person, government, governmental agency or political subdivision
of a government that relate to its duties.
3. Use the information obtained pursuant to subsections 1
and 2 to resolve matters relating to its duties.
Sec. 15. 1. Each professional and occupational licensing
board under the purview of the Office pursuant to NRS 232.8415
shall, each year at a meeting of that board, elect from among its
members a President, a Vice President and a Secretary, who shall
hold office for 1 year and until the election and qualification of
their successors. If a vacancy occurs in the office of President,
-
*AB601*

– 7 –
Vice President or Secretary, the members of the board shall elect a
President, Vice President or Secretary, as applicable, from among
the members of the board for the remainder of the unexpired term.
2. For the purposes of title 54 of NRS, any reference to the
Secretary-Treasurer of a professional or occupational licensing
board under the purview of the Office pursuant to NRS 232.8415
shall be deemed to be a reference to the Secretary elected pursuant
to subsection 1.
Sec. 16. 1. A professional or occupational licensing board
under the purview of the Office pursuant to NRS 232.8415 may
apply for and accept gifts, grants, contributions or other money
from any source to carry out the duties of the board.
2. Any money received by the board from a grant must be
used in accordance with the purpose and any conditions of the
grant and accounted for separately from other money received by
the board.
3. The Office may provide administrative support to a
professional or occupational licensing board under the purview of
the Office pursuant to NRS 232.8415 concerning grants to help
ensure accountability and maximize opportunities for funding.
Such support may include, without limitation, assistance with
grant administration and compliance.
Sec. 17. NRS 232.505 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.505 As used in NRS 232.505 to 232.866, inclusive, and
sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act, unless the context requires
otherwise:
1. “Department” means the Department of Business and
Industry.
2. “Director” means the Director of the Department.
Sec. 18. NRS 232.8413 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.8413 1. The Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and
Councils Standards is hereby created within the Department of
Business and Industry.
2. The Director shall [appoint] :
(a) Appoint a Deputy Director of the Office [and shall retain] ;
(b) To the extent that money is available, including, without
limitation, money collected from any fee imposed pursuant to
section 10 of this act, retain the required staff [and adopt the
necessary regulations and procedures] to effectively administer the
responsibilities of the Office [.] , which may include, without
limitation, executive staff, administrative and clerical staff,
research and analytical staff and other persons deemed necessary
to effectively administer the responsibilities of the Office; and
(c) Adopt the necessary regulations and procedures to
effectively administer the responsibilities of the Office.
-
*AB601*

– 8 –
Sec. 19. NRS 232.8415 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.8415 1. The Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and
Councils Standards shall be responsible for:
(a) Centralized administration;
(b) A uniform set of standards for investigations, licensing and
discipline, including, without limitation, separating the roles
and responsibilities for occupational licensure from the roles and
responsibilities for occupational discipline;
(c) A uniform set of standards for internal controls;
(d) A uniform set of standards for legal representation;
(e) A consistent set of structural standards for boards and
commissions;
(f) Transparency and consumer protection; and
(g) Efficacy and efficiency.
2. To the extent permitted by the Nevada Constitution and
federal law, all professional and occupational licensing boards
created by the Legislature shall be under the purview of the Office,
including, without limitation:
(a) The Nevada State Board of Accountancy created by
NRS 628.035.
(b) The Board of Examiners for Alcohol, Drug and Gambling
Counselors created by NRS 641C.150.
(c) The State Board of Architecture, Interior Design and
Residential Design created by NRS 623.050.
(d) The Board of Athletic Trainers created by NRS 640B.170.
(e) The State Barbers’ Health and Sanitation Board created by
NRS 643.020.
(f) The Board of Applied Behavior Analysis created by
NRS 641D.200.
(g) The Chiropractic Physicians’ Board of Nevada created by
NRS 634.020.
(h) The State Contractors’ Board created by NRS 624.040.
(i) The Commission on Construction Education created by
NRS 624.570.
(j) The State Board of Cosmetology created by NRS 644A.200.
(k) The Certified Court Reporters’ Board of Nevada created by
NRS 656.040.
(l) The Board of Dental Examiners of Nevada created by
NRS 631.120.
(m) The Committee on Dental Hygiene and Dental Therapy
created by NRS 631.205.
(n) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors created by NRS 625.100.
(o) The Nevada Funeral and Cemetery Services Board created
by NRS 642.020.
-
*AB601*

– 9 –
(p) The Nevada Board of Homeopathic Medical Examiners
created pursuant to NRS 630A.100.
(q) The State Board of Landscape Architecture created by
NRS 623A.080.
(r) The Board of Examiners for Marriage and Family Therapists
and Clinical Professional Counselors created by NRS 641A.090.
(s) The Board of Massage Therapy created by NRS 640C.150.
(t) The Board of Medical Examiners created pursuant to
NRS 630.050.
(u) The State Board of Nursing created by NRS 632.020.
(v) The Advisory Committee on Nursing Assistants and
Medication Aides created by NRS 632.072.
(w) The Board of Occupational Therapy created by
NRS 640A.080.
(x) The Board of Dispensing Opticians created by NRS 637.030.
(y) The Nevada State Board of Optometry created by
NRS 636.030.
(z) The State Board of Oriental Medicine created by
NRS 634A.030.
(aa) The State Board of Osteopathic Medicine created pursuant
to NRS 633.181.
(bb) [The Commission on Postsecondary Education created by
NRS 394.383.
(cc)] The State Board of Pharmacy created by NRS 639.020.
[(dd)] (cc) The Nevada Physical Therapy Board created by
NRS 640.030.
[(ee)] (dd) The State Board of Podiatry created by
NRS 635.020.
[(ff)] (ee) The Private Investigator’s Licensing Board created by
NRS 648.020.
[(gg)] (ff) The Board of Psychological Examiners created by
NRS 641.030.
[(hh)] (gg) The Board of Environmental Health Specialists
created by NRS 625A.030.
[(ii)] (hh) The Board of Examiners for Social Workers created
pursuant to NRS 641B.100.
[(jj)] (ii) The Speech-Language Pathology, Audiology and
Hearing Aid Dispensing Board created by NRS 637B.100.
[(kk)] (jj) The Nevada State Board of Veterinary Medical
Examiners created by NRS 638.020.
Sec. 20. NRS 232.864 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.864 1. The [Director] Office of Minority Health and
Equity of the Department of Health and Human Services shall
provide staff assistance to the Commission as the Governor deems
appropriate.
-
*AB601*

– 10 –
2. The Commission may engage the services of volunteer
workers and consultants without compensation as is necessary from
time to time.
Sec. 21. NRS 232A.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232A.030 1. Each member of a board, commission or similar
body appointed by the Governor and each person employed by a
professional or occupational licensing board as an executive
director or executive secretary or in a position with duties similar
to that of an executive director or executive secretary is deemed to
be a civil officer of this State for the purposes of Section 4 of Article
7 of the Nevada Constitution.
2. Except as otherwise provided by a specific statute, the
Governor may remove any [member of a board, commission or
similar body appointed by the Governor] person described in
subsection 1 for malfeasance or nonfeasance in the performance of
his or her duties. The Governor shall provide the [member] person
45 days’ notice of the removal unless the Governor determines that
circumstances warrant immediate removal.
3. The provisions of this section which deem the holders of
certain positions to be civil officers of this State:
(a) Are intended to supplement all other provisions of statute or
case law which make the holders of certain positions be civil
officers of this State; and
(b) Must not be construed to make the holder of any position not
described in this section not be a civil officer of this State.
Sec. 22. NRS 622.085 is hereby amended to read as follows:
622.085 1. Except as otherwise provided in chapters 624 and
648 of NRS, a regulatory body shall develop and implement a
process by which a person with a criminal history may petition the
regulatory body to review the criminal history of the person to
determine if the person’s criminal history will disqualify the person
from obtaining a license from the regulatory body.
2. Not later than 90 days after a petition is submitted to a
regulatory body pursuant to subsection 1, a regulatory body shall
inform the person of the determination of the regulatory body of
whether the person’s criminal history will disqualify the person
from obtaining a license. A regulatory body is not bound by its
determination of disqualification or qualification and may rescind
such a determination at any time.
3. A regulatory body may provide instructions to a person who
receives a determination of disqualification to remedy the
determination of disqualification. A person may resubmit a petition
pursuant to subsection 1 not earlier than 6 months after receiving
instructions pursuant to this subsection if the person remedies the
determination of disqualification.
-
*AB601*

– 11 –
4. A person with a criminal history may petition the regulatory
body at any time, including, without limitation, before obtaining any
education or paying any fee required to obtain a license from the
regulatory body.
5. A person may submit a new petition to the regulatory body
not earlier than 2 years after the final determination of the initial
petition submitted to the regulatory body.
6. A regulatory body may impose a fee of up to $50 upon the
person to fund the administrative costs in complying with the
provisions of this section. A regulatory body may waive such fees or
allow such fees to be covered by funds from a scholarship or grant.
7. A regulatory body may post on its Internet website [:] or, for
a regulatory body that is a professional or occupational licensing
board under the purview of the Office of Nevada Boards,
Commissions and Councils Standards of the Department of
Business and Industry pursuant to NRS 232.8415, the Internet
website maintained by the Office pursuant to section 13 of this act:
(a) The requirements to obtain a license from the regulatory
body; and
(b) A list of crimes, if any, that would disqualify a person from
obtaining a license from the regulatory body.
8. A regulatory body may request the criminal history record of
a person who petitions the regulatory body for a determination
pursuant to subsection 1. To the extent consistent with federal law,
if the regulatory body makes such a request of a person, the
regulatory body shall require the person to submit his or her
criminal history record which includes a report from:
(a) The Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal
History; and
(b) The Federal Bureau of Investigation.
9. A person who petitions a regulatory body for a
determination pursuant to subsection 1 shall not submit false or
misleading information to the regulatory body.
Sec. 23. NRS 623.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
623.100 [1. The Board shall appoint one of its members as
Chair, who shall serve without additional pay, and one of its
members as Secretary and Treasurer. The Chair and Secretary shall
each serve 1 year.
2.] Five members of the Board constitute a quorum, but action
shall not be deemed to have been taken upon any question unless
there are at least 4 votes in accord.
Sec. 24. NRS 623.135 is hereby amended to read as follows:
623.135 [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of
this act, the Board may employ an Executive Director, legal
counsel, investigators, professional consultants and other employees
-
*AB601*

– 12 –
necessary to the discharge of its duties, and may fix the
compensation therefor.
Sec. 25. NRS 623.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
623.220 1. The Board shall issue a certificate of registration
as an architect or a residential designer, upon payment of a
registration fee pursuant to the provisions of subsection 2 of NRS
623.180 or NRS 623.310, to any applicant who:
(a) Complies with the provisions of NRS 623.190 and passes the
examinations, or in lieu thereof, brings himself or herself within the
provisions of NRS 623.210; and
(b) Submits all information required to complete an application
for a certificate of registration.
2. The Board shall issue a certificate of registration to practice
as a registered interior designer, upon payment of a registration fee
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 623.180 or 623.310, to any
applicant who:
(a) Complies with the provisions of NRS 623.192 and 623.200,
or in lieu thereof, brings himself or herself within the provisions of
NRS 623.215; and
(b) Submits all information required to complete an application
for a certificate of registration.
3. Certificates of registration must include the full name of the
registrant, have a serial number and be signed by the [Chair]
President and the Secretary of the Board under seal of the Board.
The issuance of a certificate of registration by the Board is evidence
that the person named therein is entitled to all the rights and
privileges of an architect, registered interior designer or residential
designer while the certificate remains unsuspended, unrevoked and
unexpired.
Sec. 26. NRS 623A.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
623A.100 1. At each annual meeting of the Board, the
members shall [:
(a) Elect a President and a Secretary; and
(b) Appoint] appoint an Executive Director.
2. The President and the Secretary of the Board serve without
additional compensation.
3. The Executive Director must not be a member of the Board
and is entitled to a salary fixed by the Board.
4. The Executive Director shall:
(a) Keep an accurate record of all proceedings of the Board;
(b) Maintain custody of the official seal;
(c) Maintain a file containing the names and addresses of all
holders of certificates of registration and certificates to practice as a
landscape architect intern;
-
*AB601*

– 13 –
(d) Submit to the Board each application for a certificate of
registration or certificate to practice as a landscape architect intern
that is filed with the Board;
(e) If a holder of a certificate of registration or certificate to
practice as a landscape architect intern has violated any provision of
this chapter, file a complaint with the Attorney General; and
(f) Perform any other duties assigned by the Board.
Sec. 27. NRS 623A.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
623A.120 The Board may:
1. [Employ] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this
act, employ and fix the compensation for legal counsel, inspectors,
special agents, investigators and clerical personnel necessary to the
discharge of its duties; and
2. Reimburse an employee specified in subsection 1 for any
actual expenses incurred by the employee while acting on behalf of
the Board.
Sec. 28. NRS 624.115 is hereby amended to read as follows:
624.115 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 10
of this act, the Board may employ attorneys, investigators and other
professional consultants and clerical personnel necessary to the
discharge of its duties.
2. The Board may require criminal investigators who are
employed by the Board pursuant to NRS 624.112 to:
(a) Conduct a background investigation of:
(1) A licensee or an applicant for a contractor’s license; or
(2) An applicant for employment with the Board;
(b) Locate and identify persons who:
(1) Engage in the business or act in the capacity of a
contractor within this State in violation of the provisions of this
chapter;
(2) Submit bids on jobs situated within this State in violation
of the provisions of this chapter; or
(3) Otherwise violate the provisions of this chapter or the
regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter;
(c) Investigate any alleged occurrence of constructional fraud;
and
(d) Issue a misdemeanor citation prepared manually or
electronically pursuant to NRS 171.1773 to a person who violates a
provision of this chapter that is punishable as a misdemeanor. A
criminal investigator may request any constable, sheriff or other
peace officer to assist in the issuance of such a citation.
3. The Board may require compliance investigators who are
employed by the Board pursuant to NRS 624.112 to locate and
identify persons who:
-
*AB601*

– 14 –
(a) Engage in the business or act in the capacity of a contractor
within this State in violation of the provisions of this chapter;
(b) Submit bids on jobs situated within this State in violation of
the provisions of this chapter; or
(c) Otherwise violate the provisions of this chapter or the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
Sec. 29. NRS 624.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
624.540 1. The Board shall:
(a) On or before February 1 of each year, prepare and submit to
the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the
appropriate legislative committee if the Legislature is in session, or
to the Interim Finance Committee if the Legislature is not in session,
a statement of the condition of the account that is prepared in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
(b) [Employ accountants as necessary for the performance of the
duties set forth in this section and pay any related expenses from the
money in the account. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
the expenditures made by the Board pursuant to this paragraph must
not exceed $10,000 in any fiscal year.
(c) Employ] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this
act, employ or contract with persons and procure necessary
equipment, supplies and services to be paid from or purchased with
the money in the account as may be necessary to monitor or process
claims filed by injured persons that may result in a recovery from
the account.
2. Any interest earned on the money in the account must be
credited to the account. The Board may expend the interest earned
on the money in the account to increase public awareness of the
account. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the
expenditures made by the Board for this purpose must not exceed
$50,000 in any fiscal year.
3. The total expenditures made by the Board pursuant to this
section must not exceed 10 percent of the account in any fiscal year.
Sec. 30. NRS 625.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
625.110 1. The Board shall elect officers from its members
and, by regulation, establish the:
(a) Offices to which members may be elected [;] , in addition to
those required by section 15 of this act;
(b) Title and term for each office [;] other than President, Vice
President and Secretary; and
(c) Procedure for electing members to each office.
2. At any meeting, five members constitute a quorum.
3. Each member is entitled to receive:
(a) A salary of not more than $150 per day, as fixed by the
Board, while engaged in the business of the Board; and
-
*AB601*

– 15 –
(b) A per diem allowance and travel expenses, at a rate fixed by
the Board, while engaged in the business of the Board. The rate
must not exceed the rate provided for state officers and employees
generally.
4. While engaged in the business of the Board, each employee
of the Board is entitled to receive a per diem allowance and travel
expenses at a rate fixed by the Board. The rate must not exceed the
rate provided for state officers and employees generally.
5. The salaries of members of the Board and employees of the
Board must be paid from the fees received by the Board pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter, and no part of those salaries may be
paid out of the State General Fund.
6. The Board shall appoint an Executive Director who serves at
the pleasure of the Board and is entitled to receive such
compensation as may be fixed by the Board.
Sec. 31. NRS 625.135 is hereby amended to read as follows:
625.135 [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of
this act, the Board may employ and fix the compensation to be paid
to attorneys, investigators and other professional consultants and
clerical personnel necessary to the discharge of its duties and may
reimburse such employees for actual expenses they incur while
acting on behalf of the Board.
Sec. 32. NRS 625.381 is hereby amended to read as follows:
625.381 1. The Board shall issue a license to practice
professional engineering or land surveying to any applicant who, in
the opinion of the Board, has complied with all the requirements of
this chapter concerning professional engineers or professional land
surveyors, respectively.
2. A license to practice professional engineering or land
surveying must:
(a) Set forth the full name of the licensee.
(b) Include the number of the license.
(c) Be signed by the [Chair] President and Executive Director
under the seal of the Board.
(d) Authorize the practice of professional engineering in the
discipline for which the applicant has qualified or the practice of
land surveying, respectively.
3. The issuance of a license to practice professional
engineering or land surveying by the Board is evidence that the
licensee is entitled to all the rights and privileges of a professional
engineer or professional land surveyor, respectively, while the
license remains on active status.
Sec. 33. NRS 625.440 is hereby amended to read as follows:
625.440 The [Chair] President of the Board or his or her
designee may subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, and
-
*AB601*

– 16 –
also may require the production of books, papers and documents
relating to any investigation or hearing conducted by the Board.
Sec. 34. NRS 625A.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
625A.030 1. There is hereby created the Board of
Environmental Health Specialists, consisting of the Chief Medical
Officer or his or her designated representative and four members
appointed by the Governor.
2. After the initial terms, each member appointed by the
Governor serves a term of 3 years.
3. Of the members of the Board appointed by the Governor
after the initial appointments:
(a) Two members must represent the general public. These
members must not be:
(1) An environmental health specialist or environmental
health specialist trainee; or
(2) The spouse or the parent or child, by blood, marriage or
adoption, of an environmental health specialist or environmental
health specialist trainee.
(b) Two members must be environmental health specialists:
(1) Each of whom:
(I) Holds a current registration issued pursuant to NRS
625A.110 and is in good standing with the Board; and
(II) Must have practiced in the field of environmental
health for the 3 years immediately preceding his or her appointment.
(2) Of whom, one must be employed by the health district
containing Washoe County and one must be employed by the health
district containing Clark County.
4. Each member of the Board must be a resident of this State.
5. If a vacancy occurs during the term of a member appointed
by the Governor, the Governor shall appoint a person similarly
qualified to replace that member for the remainder of the unexpired
term.
6. The Governor may, after notice and hearing, remove any
member of the Board for misconduct in office, incompetency,
neglect of duty or other sufficient cause.
[7. The Board shall elect from its members who are appointed
by the Governor a Chair and Vice Chair. The officers of the Board
hold their respective offices at the pleasure of the Board.]
Sec. 35. NRS 625A.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
625A.040 1. The Board shall hold at least two meetings
annually and may meet at other times on the call of the [Chair]
President or a majority of its members.
2. A majority of the Board constitutes a quorum to transact all
business.
-
*AB601*

– 17 –
3. The Board shall comply with the provisions of chapter 241
of NRS and all meetings of the Board must be conducted in
accordance with that chapter.
Sec. 36. NRS 625A.055 is hereby amended to read as follows:
625A.055 1. The Board may employ and fix the
compensation to be paid to:
(a) An Executive Director; and
(b) [Attorneys,] Except as otherwise provided section 10 of this
act, attorneys, investigators and other professional consultants and
any other employee necessary to the discharge of its duties.
2. The Board may reimburse its employees for any actual
expenses they incur while acting on behalf of the Board. Any
reimbursement paid pursuant to this section is in addition to any per
diem allowance or travel expenses paid to those employees pursuant
to NRS 625A.050.
3. The expenses of the Board and members of the Board, and
the salaries of its employees, must be paid from the fees received by
the Board pursuant to this chapter, and no part of those expenses and
salaries may be paid out of the State General Fund.
Sec. 37. NRS 628.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
628.090 [1. Annually the Board shall elect a President and a
Secretary-Treasurer from among its members.
2. The] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this act,
the Board may employ such personnel, including attorneys,
investigators and other professional consultants, and arrange for
such assistance as the Board may require for the performance of its
duties.
Sec. 38. NRS 628.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
628.130 The Board shall:
1. Have a seal of which judicial notice must be taken.
2. Keep records of its proceedings. In any proceedings in court,
civil or criminal, arising out of or founded upon any provision of
this chapter, copies of those records certified as correct under the
seal of the Board are admissible in evidence as tending to prove the
contents of the records.
3. [Maintain a website on the] Post on the Internet [or its
successor and post on its] website [:] maintained by the Office of
Nevada Boards, Commissions and Councils Standards of the
Department of Business and Industry pursuant to section 13 of
this act:
(a) The names arranged alphabetically by classifications of all
accountants and business entities holding certificates, registrations
or permits under this chapter.
(b) The names of the members of the Board.
(c) Such other matter as may be deemed proper by the Board.
-
*AB601*

– 18 –
Sec. 39. NRS 628.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
628.160 1. The Board may by regulation adopt and amend
rules of professional conduct appropriate to establish and maintain a
high standard of quality, integrity and dignity in the profession of
public accountancy.
2. In addition to the requirements of chapter 233B of NRS, the
Board shall provide notice of any such proposed rule or amendment
to each holder of a live permit, to the electronic mail address shown
in the records of the Board, along with information advising the
holder of the permit of the date, time and place of the hearing on the
proposed rule or amendment and requesting that he or she submit
any comments thereon at least 15 days before the hearing. The
comments are advisory only. The Board shall also make available
on [its] the Internet website maintained by the Office of Nevada
Boards, Commissions and Councils Standards of the Department
of Business and Industry pursuant to section 13 of this act the
proposed rule or amendment.
3. The Board may adopt regulations concerning the
professional conduct of corporations, partnerships and limited-
liability companies practicing certified public accounting or public
accounting which it deems consistent with or required by the public
welfare, including regulations:
(a) Governing the style, name and title of the corporations,
partnerships and limited-liability companies.
(b) Governing the affiliation of the corporations, partnerships
and limited-liability companies with any other organizations.
Sec. 40. NRS 629.053 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.053 1. The State Board of Health and each board created
pursuant to chapter 630, 630A, 631, 632, 633, 634, 634A, 635, 636,
637, 637B, 640, 640A, 640B, 640C, 641, 641A, 641B, 641C or
641D of NRS shall post on its website on the Internet, if any, or, for
a professional or occupational licensing board under the purview
of the Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and Councils
Standards pursuant to NRS 232.8415, the Internet website
maintained by the Office pursuant to section 13 of this act, as
applicable, a statement which discloses that:
(a) Pursuant to the provisions of subsection 7 of NRS 629.051:
(1) The health care records of a person who is less than 23
years of age may not be destroyed; and
(2) The health care records of a person who has attained the
age of 23 years may be destroyed for those records which have been
retained for at least 5 years or for any longer period provided by
federal law; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7 of NRS
629.051 and unless a longer period is provided by federal law, the
-
*AB601*

– 19 –
health care records of a patient who is 23 years of age or older may
be destroyed after 5 years pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 629.051.
2. The State Board of Health shall adopt regulations
prescribing the contents of the statements required pursuant to this
section.
Sec. 41. NRS 630.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.090 [1. The Board shall elect from its members a
President, a Vice President and a Secretary-Treasurer. The officers
of the Board shall hold their respective offices during its pleasure.
2.] The Secretary-Treasurer of the Board shall receive a salary,
the amount of which shall be determined by the Board.
Sec. 42. NRS 630.106 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.106 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 10
of this act, the Board may employ hearing officers, experts,
administrators, attorneys, investigators, consultants and clerical
personnel necessary to the discharge of its duties.
2. Each employee of the Board is an at-will employee who
serves at the pleasure of the Board. The Board may discharge an
employee of the Board for any reason that does not violate public
policy, including, without limitation, making a false representation
to the Board.
3. A hearing officer employed by the Board shall not act in any
other capacity for the Board or occupy any other position of
employment with the Board, and the Board shall not assign the
hearing officer any duties which are unrelated to the duties of a
hearing officer.
4. If a person resigns his or her position as a hearing officer or
the Board terminates the person from his or her position as a hearing
officer, the Board may not rehire the person in any position of
employment with the Board for a period of 2 years following the
date of the resignation or termination. The provisions of this
subsection do not give a person any right to be rehired by the Board
and do not permit the Board to rehire a person who is prohibited
from being employed by the Board pursuant to any other provision
of law.
Sec. 43. NRS 630.144 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.144 1. [The Board shall maintain a website on the
Internet or its successor.
2.] The Board shall adopt policies and procedures for placing
information on [its] the Internet website [.] maintained by the
Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and Councils Standards of
the Department of Business and Industry pursuant to section 13 of
this act.
[3.] 2. The Board shall place on [its] the Internet website:
-
*AB601*

– 20 –
(a) Each application form for the issuance or renewal of a
license issued by the Board pursuant to this chapter.
(b) A list of questions that are frequently asked concerning the
processes of the Board and the answers to those questions.
(c) An alphabetical list, by last name, of each licensee and a
brief description of each disciplinary action, if any, taken against the
licensee, in this State and elsewhere, which relates to his or her
practice and which is noted in the records of the Board. The Board
shall include, as part of the list on the Internet website, the name of
each licensee whose license has been revoked by the Board. The
Board shall make the list on the Internet website easily accessible
and user friendly for the public.
(d) All financial reports received by the Board.
(e) All financial reports prepared by the Board.
(f) Any other information that the Board is required to place on
[its] the Internet website pursuant to any other provision of law.
Sec. 44. NRS 630.146 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.146 The Board shall post on [a] the Internet website [or
other Internet site that is operated or administered by or on behalf of
the Board:] maintained by the Office of Nevada Boards,
Commissions and Councils Standards of the Department of
Business and Industry pursuant to section 13 of this act:
1. A general description of the basic elements of the
Compliance Program Guidance for Pharmaceutical Manufacturers
that is published by the Office of Inspector General of the United
States Department of Health and Human Services, or links to
websites or other Internet sites that are operated or administered by
or on behalf of the Office of Inspector General where such
information may be obtained;
2. A general description of the process for reporting unlawful
or unethical conduct by pharmaceutical manufacturers to the Office
of Inspector General, or links to websites or other Internet sites that
are operated or administered by or on behalf of the Office of
Inspector General where such information may be obtained; and
3. A current telephone number for the Office of Inspector
General.
Sec. 45. NRS 630.2672 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.2672 1. In addition to any other requirements set forth in
this chapter and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto, each
applicant for the renewal of any type of license as a physician
pursuant to this chapter or a biennial registration pursuant to NRS
630.267 shall complete the data request developed by the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
439A.124. The applicant shall provide to the Department all the
information requested by the data request.
-
*AB601*

– 21 –
2. The Board shall make the data request described in
subsection 1 available to applicants for the renewal of a license as a
physician or biennial registration on an electronic application for the
renewal of a license or registration or through a link included on the
Internet website maintained by the [Board.] Office of Nevada
Boards, Commissions and Councils Standards of the Department
of Business and Industry pursuant to section 13 of this act.
3. An applicant for biennial registration or renewal of a license
who refuses or fails to complete a data request pursuant to
subsection 1 is not subject to disciplinary action, including, without
limitation, refusal to issue the biennial registration or renew the
license, for such refusal or failure.
4. The information contained in a completed data request is
confidential and, except as required by NRS 439A.124, must not be
disclosed to any person or entity.
Sec. 46. NRS 630.323 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.323 1. The Executive Director of the Board or his or her
designee shall review and evaluate any complaint or information
received from the Investigation Division of the Department of
Public Safety or the State Board of Pharmacy, including, without
limitation, information provided pursuant to NRS 453.164, or from
a law enforcement agency, professional licensing board or any other
source indicating that:
(a) A licensee has issued a fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or
otherwise inappropriate prescription for a controlled substance listed
in schedule II, III or IV;
(b) A pattern of prescriptions issued by a licensee indicates that
the licensee has issued prescriptions in the manner described in
paragraph (a); or
(c) A patient of a licensee has acquired, used or possessed a
controlled substance listed in schedule II, III or IV in a fraudulent,
illegal, unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate manner.
2. If the Executive Director of the Board or his or her designee
receives information described in subsection 1 concerning the
licensee, the Executive Director or his or her designee must notify
the licensee as soon as practicable after receiving the information.
3. A review and evaluation conducted pursuant to subsection 1
must include, without limitation:
(a) A review of relevant information contained in the database
of the program established pursuant to NRS 453.162; and
(b) A request for additional relevant information from the
licensee who is the subject of the review and evaluation.
4. If, after a review and evaluation conducted pursuant to
subsection 1, the Executive Director or his or her designee
determines that a licensee may have issued a fraudulent, illegal,
-
*AB601*

– 22 –
unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate prescription for a controlled
substance listed in schedule II, III or IV, the Board must proceed as
if a written complaint had been filed against the licensee. If, after
conducting an investigation and a hearing in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter, the Board determines that the licensee
issued a fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate
prescription, the Board must impose appropriate disciplinary action.
5. When deemed appropriate, the Executive Director of the
Board may:
(a) Refer information acquired during a review and evaluation
conducted pursuant to subsection 1 to another professional licensing
board, law enforcement agency or other appropriate governmental
entity for investigation and criminal or administrative proceedings.
(b) Postpone any notification, review or part of such a review
required by this section if he or she determines that it is necessary to
avoid interfering with any pending administrative or criminal
investigation into the suspected fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or
otherwise inappropriate prescribing, dispensing or use of a
controlled substance.
6. The Board shall:
(a) Adopt regulations providing for disciplinary action against a
licensee for inappropriately prescribing a controlled substance listed
in schedule II, III or IV or violating the provisions of NRS 639.2391
to 639.23916, inclusive, and any regulations adopted by the State
Board of Pharmacy pursuant thereto. Such disciplinary action must
include, without limitation, requiring the licensee to complete
additional continuing education concerning prescribing controlled
substances listed in schedules II, III and IV.
(b) Develop and disseminate to each physician and physician
assistant licensed pursuant to this chapter or make available on the
Internet website [of the Board] maintained by the Office of Nevada
Boards, Commissions and Councils Standards of the Department
of Business and Industry pursuant to section 13 of this act an
explanation or a technical advisory bulletin to inform those
physicians and physician assistants of the requirements of this
section and NRS 630.324, 639.23507 and 639.2391 to 639.23916,
inclusive, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto. The Board
shall update the explanation or bulletin as necessary to include any
revisions to those provisions of law or regulations. The explanation
or bulletin must include, without limitation, an explanation of the
requirements that apply to specific controlled substances or
categories of controlled substances.
-
*AB601*

– 23 –
Sec. 47. NRS 630A.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.140 1. [The Board shall elect from its members a
President, a Vice President and a Secretary-Treasurer. The officers
of the Board hold their respective offices during its pleasure.
2.] The Board shall receive through its Secretary-Treasurer
applications for the licenses and certificates issued under this
chapter.
[3.] 2. The Secretary-Treasurer is entitled to receive a salary,
in addition to the salary paid pursuant to NRS 630A.160, the
amount of which must be determined by the Board.
Sec. 48. NRS 630A.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.190 The Board may:
1. Maintain offices in as many localities in the State as it finds
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
2. [Employ] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this
act, employ attorneys, investigators, hearing officers, experts,
administrators, consultants and clerical personnel necessary to the
discharge of its duties.
Sec. 49. NRS 630A.560 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.560 In a manner consistent with the provisions of chapter
622A of NRS, the Board is authorized to prosecute all persons
guilty of violation of the provisions of this chapter and , except as
otherwise provided in section 10 of this act, may employ
investigators and such other assistants as may be necessary to carry
out the provisions of this chapter and chapter 622A of NRS, but any
expenses so incurred must not be paid out of the State General Fund.
Sec. 50. NRS 631.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
631.160 1. [At the first regular meeting of each year, the
Board shall elect from its membership one of its members as
President and one of its members as Secretary-Treasurer, each of
whom shall hold office for 1 year and until a successor is elected
and qualified.
2.] The Board shall define the duties of the President, the
Secretary-Treasurer and the Executive Director.
[3.] 2. The Executive Director shall receive such compensation
as determined by the Board, and the Board shall fix the amount of
the bond to be furnished by the Secretary-Treasurer and the
Executive Director.
Sec. 51. NRS 631.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
631.190 In addition to the powers and duties provided in this
chapter, the Board shall:
1. Adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out the
provisions of this chapter.
2. [Appoint] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of
this act, appoint such committees, review panels, examiners,
-
*AB601*

– 24 –
officers, employees, agents, attorneys, investigators and other
professional consultants and define their duties and incur such
expense as it may deem proper or necessary to carry out the
provisions of this chapter, the expense to be paid as provided in this
chapter.
3. Fix the time and place for and conduct examinations for the
granting of licenses to practice dentistry, dental hygiene, dental
therapy and expanded function dental assistance.
4. Examine applicants for licenses to practice dentistry, dental
hygiene, dental therapy and expanded function dental assistance.
5. Collect and apply fees as provided in this chapter.
6. Keep a register of all dentists, dental hygienists, dental
therapists and expanded function dental assistants licensed in this
State, together with their addresses, license numbers and renewal
certificate numbers.
7. Have and use a common seal.
8. Keep such records as may be necessary to report the acts and
proceedings of the Board. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
631.368, the records must be open to public inspection.
9. Maintain offices in as many localities in the State as it finds
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
10. Have discretion to examine work authorizations in dental
offices or dental laboratories.
Sec. 52. NRS 631.364 is hereby amended to read as follows:
631.364 1. The Executive Director of the Board or his or her
designee shall review and evaluate any complaint or information
received from the Investigation Division of the Department of
Public Safety or the State Board of Pharmacy, including, without
limitation, information provided pursuant to NRS 453.164, or from
a law enforcement agency, professional licensing board or any other
source indicating that:
(a) A licensee has issued a fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or
otherwise inappropriate prescription for a controlled substance listed
in schedule II, III or IV;
(b) A pattern of prescriptions issued by a licensee indicates that
the licensee has issued prescriptions in the manner described in
paragraph (a); or
(c) A patient of a licensee has acquired, used or possessed a
controlled substance listed in schedule II, III or IV in a fraudulent,
illegal, unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate manner.
2. If the Executive Director of the Board or his or her designee
receives information described in subsection 1 concerning the
licensee, the Executive Director or his or her designee must notify
the licensee as soon as practicable after receiving the information.
-
*AB601*

– 25 –
3. A review and evaluation conducted pursuant to subsection 1
must include, without limitation:
(a) A review of relevant information contained in the database
of the program established pursuant to NRS 453.162; and
(b) A request for additional relevant information from the
licensee who is the subject of the review and evaluation.
4. If, after a review and evaluation conducted pursuant to
subsection 1, the Executive Director or his or her designee
determines that a licensee may have issued a fraudulent, illegal,
unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate prescription for a controlled
substance listed in schedule II, III or IV, the Board must proceed as
if a written complaint had been filed against the licensee. If, after
conducting an investigation and a hearing in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter, the Board determines that the licensee
issued a fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate
prescription, the Board must impose appropriate disciplinary action.
5. When deemed appropriate, the Executive Director of the
Board may:
(a) Refer information acquired during a review and evaluation
conducted pursuant to subsection 1 to another professional licensing
board, law enforcement agency or other appropriate governmental
entity for investigation and criminal or administrative proceedings.
(b) Postpone any notification, review or part of such a review
required by this section if he or she determines that it is necessary to
avoid interfering with any pending administrative or criminal
investigation into the suspected fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or
otherwise inappropriate prescribing, dispensing or use of a
controlled substance.
6. The Board shall:
(a) Adopt regulations providing for disciplinary action against a
licensee for inappropriately prescribing a controlled substance listed
in schedule II, III or IV or violating the provisions of NRS 639.2391
to 639.23916, inclusive, and any regulations adopted by the State
Board of Pharmacy pursuant thereto. Such disciplinary action must
include, without limitation, requiring the licensee to complete
additional continuing education concerning prescribing controlled
substances listed in schedules II, III and IV.
(b) Develop and disseminate to each dentist licensed pursuant to
this chapter or make available on the Internet website [of the Board]
maintained by the Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and
Councils Standards of the Department of Business and Industry
pursuant to section 13 of this act an explanation or a technical
advisory bulletin to inform those dentists of the requirements of this
section and NRS 631.365, 639.23507 and 639.2391 to 639.23916,
inclusive, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto. The Board
-
*AB601*

– 26 –
shall update the explanation or bulletin as necessary to include any
revisions to those provisions of law or regulations. The explanation
or bulletin must include, without limitation, an explanation of the
requirements that apply to specific controlled substances or
categories of controlled substances.
Sec. 53. NRS 632.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
632.060 [1. Each year at a meeting of the Board, to be held in
accordance with NRS 632.070, the Board shall elect from its
members a President, a Vice President and a Secretary.
2.] The Board may appoint an Executive Director who need
not be a member of the Board. The Executive Director appointed by
the Board must be a professional nurse licensed to practice nursing
in the State of Nevada. The Executive Director shall perform such
duties as the Board may direct and is entitled to receive
compensation as set by the Board. The Executive Director is entitled
to receive a per diem allowance and travel expenses at a rate fixed
by the Board, while engaged in the business of the Board. The rate
must not exceed the rate provided for state officers and employees
generally.
Sec. 54. NRS 632.065 is hereby amended to read as follows:
632.065 The Board may:
1. Maintain offices in as many localities in the State as it finds
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
2. [Employ] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this
act, employ attorneys, investigators and other professional
consultants and clerical personnel necessary to the discharge of its
duties.
Sec. 55. NRS 632.352 is hereby amended to read as follows:
632.352 1. The Executive Director of the Board or his or her
designee shall review and evaluate any complaint or information
received from the Investigation Division of the Department of
Public Safety or the State Board of Pharmacy, including, without
limitation, information provided pursuant to NRS 453.164, or from
a law enforcement agency, professional licensing board or any other
source indicating that:
(a) A licensee has issued a fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or
otherwise inappropriate prescription for a controlled substance listed
in schedule II, III or IV;
(b) A pattern of prescriptions issued by a licensee indicates that
the licensee has issued prescriptions in the manner described in
paragraph (a); or
(c) A patient of a licensee has acquired, used or possessed a
controlled substance listed in schedule II, III or IV in a fraudulent,
illegal, unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate manner.
-
*AB601*

– 27 –
2. If the Executive Director of the Board or his or her designee
receives information described in subsection 1 concerning the
licensee, the Executive Director or his or her designee must notify
the licensee as soon as practicable after receiving the information.
3. A review and evaluation conducted pursuant to subsection 1
must include, without limitation:
(a) A review of relevant information contained in the database
of the program established pursuant to NRS 453.162; and
(b) A request for additional relevant information from the
licensee who is the subject of the review and evaluation.
4. If, after a review and evaluation conducted pursuant to
subsection 1, the Executive Director or his or her designee
determines that a licensee may have issued a fraudulent, illegal,
unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate prescription for a controlled
substance listed in schedule II, III or IV, the Board must proceed as
if a written complaint had been filed against the licensee. If, after
conducting an investigation and a hearing in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter, the Board determines that the licensee
issued a fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate
prescription, the Board must impose appropriate disciplinary action.
5. When deemed appropriate, the Executive Director of the
Board may:
(a) Refer information acquired during a review and evaluation
conducted pursuant to subsection 1 to another professional licensing
board, law enforcement agency or other appropriate governmental
entity for investigation and criminal or administrative proceedings.
(b) Postpone any notification, review or part of such a review
required by this section if he or she determines that it is necessary to
avoid interfering with any pending administrative or criminal
investigation into the suspected fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or
otherwise inappropriate prescribing, dispensing or use of a
controlled substance.
6. The Board shall:
(a) Adopt regulations providing for disciplinary action against a
licensee for inappropriately prescribing a controlled substance listed
in schedule II, III or IV or violating the provisions of NRS 639.2391
to 639.23916, inclusive, and any regulations adopted by the State
Board of Pharmacy pursuant thereto. Such disciplinary action must
include, without limitation, requiring the licensee to complete
additional continuing education concerning prescribing controlled
substances listed in schedules II, III and IV.
(b) Develop and disseminate to each advanced practice
registered nurse licensed pursuant to NRS 632.237 or make
available on the Internet website [of the Board] maintained by the
Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and Councils Standards of
-
*AB601*

– 28 –
the Department of Business and Industry pursuant to section 13 of
this act an explanation or a technical advisory bulletin to inform
those advanced practice registered nurses of the requirements of this
section and NRS 632.353, 639.23507 and 639.2391 to 639.23916,
inclusive, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto. The Board
shall update the explanation or bulletin as necessary to include any
revisions to those provisions of law or regulations. The explanation
or bulletin must include, without limitation, an explanation of the
requirements that apply to specific controlled substances or
categories of controlled substances.
Sec. 56. NRS 633.271 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.271 The Board may:
1. Appoint an Executive Director who is entitled to such
compensation as is determined by the Board.
2. Maintain offices in as many localities in the State as it finds
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
3. [Employ] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this
act, employ attorneys, hearing officers, investigators and other
professional consultants and clerical personnel necessary to the
discharge of its duties.
Sec. 57. NRS 633.4717 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.4717 1. In addition to any other requirements set forth in
this chapter and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto, each
applicant for the renewal of any type of license as an osteopathic
physician pursuant to this chapter shall complete the data request
developed by the Department of Health and Human Services
pursuant to NRS 439A.124. The applicant shall provide to the
Department all the information included in the request.
2. The Board shall make the data request described in
subsection 1 available to applicants for the renewal of a license as
an osteopathic physician on an electronic application for the renewal
of a license or through a link included on the Internet website
maintained by the [Board.] Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions
and Councils Standards of the Department of Business and
Industry pursuant to section 13 of this act.
3. An applicant for biennial registration or renewal of a license
who refuses or fails to complete a data request pursuant to
subsection 1 is not subject to disciplinary action, including, without
limitation, refusal to issue the biennial registration or renew the
license, for such refusal or failure.
4. The information contained in a completed data request is
confidential and, except as required by NRS 439A.124, must not be
disclosed to any person or entity.
-
*AB601*

– 29 –
Sec. 58. NRS 633.574 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.574 1. The Executive Director of the Board or his or her
designee shall review and evaluate any complaint or information
received from the Investigation Division of the Department of
Public Safety or the State Board of Pharmacy, including, without
limitation, information provided pursuant to NRS 453.164, or from
a law enforcement agency, professional licensing board or any other
source indicating that:
(a) A licensee has issued a fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or
otherwise inappropriate prescription for a controlled substance listed
in schedule II, III or IV;
(b) A pattern of prescriptions issued by a licensee indicates that
the licensee has issued prescriptions in the manner described in
paragraph (a); or
(c) A patient of a licensee has acquired, used or possessed a
controlled substance listed in schedule II, III or IV in a fraudulent,
illegal, unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate manner.
2. If the Executive Director of the Board or his or her designee
receives information described in subsection 1 concerning the
licensee, the Executive Director or his or her designee must notify
the licensee as soon as practicable after receiving the information.
3. A review and evaluation conducted pursuant to subsection 1
must include, without limitation:
(a) A review of relevant information contained in the database
of the program established pursuant to NRS 453.162; and
(b) A request for additional relevant information from the
licensee who is the subject of the review and evaluation.
4. If, after a review and evaluation conducted pursuant to
subsection 1, the Executive Director or his or her designee
determines that a licensee may have issued a fraudulent, illegal,
unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate prescription for a controlled
substance listed in schedule II, III or IV, the Board must proceed as
if a written complaint had been filed against the licensee. If, after
conducting an investigation and a hearing in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter, the Board determines that the licensee
issued a fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate
prescription, the Board must impose appropriate disciplinary action.
5. When deemed appropriate, the Executive Director of the
Board may:
(a) Refer information acquired during a review and evaluation
conducted pursuant to subsection 1 to another professional licensing
board, law enforcement agency or other appropriate governmental
entity for investigation and criminal or administrative proceedings.
(b) Postpone any notification, review or part of such a review
required by this section if he or she determines that it is necessary to
-
*AB601*

– 30 –
avoid interfering with any pending administrative or criminal
investigation into the suspected fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or
otherwise inappropriate prescribing, dispensing or use of a
controlled substance.
6. The Board shall:
(a) Adopt regulations providing for disciplinary action against a
licensee for inappropriately prescribing a controlled substance listed
in schedule II, III or IV or violating the provisions of NRS 639.2391
to 639.23916, inclusive, and any regulations adopted by the State
Board of Pharmacy pursuant thereto. Such disciplinary action must
include, without limitation, requiring the licensee to complete
additional continuing education concerning prescribing controlled
substances listed in schedules II, III and IV.
(b) Develop and disseminate to each osteopathic physician and
physician assistant licensed pursuant to this chapter or make
available on the Internet website [of the Board] maintained by the
Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and Councils Standards of
the Department of Business and Industry pursuant to section 13 of
this act an explanation or a technical advisory bulletin to inform
those osteopathic physicians and physician assistants of the
requirements of this section and NRS 633.577, 639.23507 and
639.2391 to 639.23916, inclusive, and any regulations adopted
pursuant thereto. The Board shall update the explanation or bulletin
as necessary to include any revisions to those provisions of law or
regulations. The explanation or bulletin must include, without
limitation, an explanation of the requirements that apply to specific
controlled substances or categories of controlled substances.
Sec. 59. NRS 633.731 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.731 In a manner consistent with the provisions of chapter
622A of NRS, the Board shall cause the prosecution of all persons
who commit any act prohibited by this chapter. [The] Except as
otherwise provided in section 10 of this act, the Board may employ
investigators and such other assistants as may be necessary to carry
into effect the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 60. NRS 634.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
634.030 1. [The Board shall elect a President, Vice President
and a Secretary.] The Secretary of the Board shall serve also as
Treasurer of the Board.
2. The Board shall adopt reasonable regulations for the
transaction of business and to enable it to carry out its duties under
this chapter.
Sec. 61. NRS 634.043 is hereby amended to read as follows:
634.043 1. The Board shall appoint an Executive Director
who serves at the pleasure of the Board and is entitled to receive
such compensation as may be fixed by the Board.
-
*AB601*

– 31 –
2. The Board may:
(a) Maintain offices in as many localities in the State as it finds
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
(b) [Employ] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this
act, employ attorneys, investigators and other professional
consultants and clerical personnel necessary to the discharge of its
duties.
3. The Board or any agent of the Board may enter any premises
in this State where a person who holds a license or certificate issued
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter practices chiropractic or as
a chiropractic assistant and inspect it to determine whether a
violation of any provision of this chapter has occurred, including,
without limitation, an inspection to determine whether any person at
the premises is practicing chiropractic or as a chiropractic assistant
without the appropriate license or certificate issued pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 62. NRS 634A.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
634A.070 The Board may:
1. [Employ] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this
act, employ attorneys, investigators and other professional
consultants and clerical personnel necessary to discharge its duties.
To conduct its examinations, the Board may call to its aid persons of
established reputation and known ability in Oriental medicine.
2. Maintain offices in as many localities in the State as it finds
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
3. Adopt regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of this
chapter. The regulations may include a code of ethics regulating the
professional conduct of licensees.
4. Compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of
evidence by subpoena.
Sec. 63. NRS 635.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
635.030 1. [The] In addition to the officers required to be
elected pursuant to section 15 of this act, the Board shall elect from
among its members a [President, a Vice President, a Secretary and
a] Treasurer. The members may assign the duties of the Treasurer
and the Secretary to one person who must be designated the
Secretary-Treasurer.
2. The Board shall adopt regulations to carry out the provisions
of this chapter.
3. The Board shall not incur any expenses which exceed the
money received from time to time as fees provided by law.
4. The Board shall keep and preserve a complete record of all
its transactions.
5. The Board may adopt a seal of which any court of this State
may take judicial notice.
-
*AB601*

– 32 –
Sec. 64. NRS 635.035 is hereby amended to read as follows:
635.035 1. The Board may:
(a) Maintain offices in as many localities in the State as it finds
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
(b) [Employ] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this
act, employ attorneys, investigators and other professional
consultants and clerical personnel necessary to the discharge of its
duties.
2. The Board or any agent of the Board may enter any premises
in this State where a person who holds a license issued pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter practices podiatry or as a podiatry
hygienist and inspect it to determine whether a violation of any
provision of this chapter has occurred, including, without limitation,
an inspection to determine whether any person at the premises is
practicing podiatry or as a podiatry hygienist without the appropriate
license issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 65. NRS 635.152 is hereby amended to read as follows:
635.152 1. The President of the Board or his or her designee
shall review and evaluate any complaint or information received
from the Investigation Division of the Department of Public Safety
or the State Board of Pharmacy, including, without limitation,
information provided pursuant to NRS 453.164, or from a law
enforcement agency, professional licensing board or any other
source indicating that:
(a) A licensee has issued a fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or
otherwise inappropriate prescription for a controlled substance listed
in schedule II, III or IV;
(b) A pattern of prescriptions issued by a licensee indicates that
the licensee has issued prescriptions in the manner described in
paragraph (a); or
(c) A patient of a licensee has acquired, used or possessed a
controlled substance listed in schedule II, III or IV in a fraudulent,
illegal, unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate manner.
2. If the President of the Board or his or her designee receives
information described in subsection 1 concerning the licensee, the
President or his or her designee must notify the licensee as soon as
practicable after receiving the information.
3. A review and evaluation conducted pursuant to subsection 1
must include, without limitation:
(a) A review of relevant information contained in the database
of the program established pursuant to NRS 453.162; and
(b) A request for additional relevant information from the
licensee who is the subject of the review and evaluation.
4. If, after a review and evaluation conducted pursuant to
subsection 1, the President or his or her designee determines that a
-
*AB601*

– 33 –
licensee may have issued a fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or
otherwise inappropriate prescription for a controlled substance listed
in schedule II, III or IV, the Board must proceed as if a written
complaint had been filed against the licensee. If, after conducting an
investigation and a hearing in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter, the Board determines that the licensee issued a fraudulent,
illegal, unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate prescription, the
Board must impose appropriate disciplinary action.
5. When deemed appropriate, the President of the Board may:
(a) Refer information acquired during a review and evaluation
conducted pursuant to subsection 1 to another professional licensing
board, law enforcement agency or other appropriate governmental
entity for investigation and criminal or administrative proceedings.
(b) Postpone any notification, review or part of such a review
required by this section if he or she determines that it is necessary to
avoid interfering with any pending administrative or criminal
investigation into the suspected fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or
otherwise inappropriate prescribing, dispensing or use of a
controlled substance.
6. The Board shall:
(a) Adopt regulations providing for disciplinary action against a
licensee for inappropriately prescribing a controlled substance listed
in schedule II, III or IV or violating the provisions of NRS 639.2391
to 639.23916, inclusive, and any regulations adopted by the State
Board of Pharmacy pursuant thereto. Such disciplinary action must
include, without limitation, requiring the licensee to complete
additional continuing education concerning prescribing controlled
substances listed in schedules II, III and IV.
(b) Develop and disseminate to each podiatric physician
licensed pursuant to this chapter or make available on the Internet
website [of the Board] maintained by the Office of Nevada Boards,
Commissions and Councils Standards of the Department of
Business and Industry pursuant to section 13 of this act an
explanation or a technical advisory bulletin to inform those podiatric
physicians of the requirements of this section and NRS 635.153,
639.23507 and 639.2391 to 639.23916, inclusive, and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto. The Board shall update the
explanation or bulletin as necessary to include any revisions to those
provisions of law or regulations. The explanation or bulletin must
include, without limitation, an explanation of the requirements that
apply to specific controlled substances or categories of controlled
substances.
Sec. 66. NRS 636.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
636.080 [1. At the first meeting of the Board held each fiscal
year, the Board shall meet and organize by electing from its
-
*AB601*

– 34 –
membership a President who shall hold office for 1 year and until
the election and qualification of his or her successor.
2.] The Board shall appoint an Executive Director who serves
at the pleasure of the Board and is entitled to receive compensation
as set by the Board. The Executive Director must not be a member
of the Board. If a vacancy occurs in the position of Executive
Director, the Board may appoint one of its members to perform the
duties of the Executive Director until the position is filled. A
member of the Board who is appointed to perform the duties of the
Executive Director is not entitled to receive any compensation for
performing those duties.
Sec. 67. NRS 636.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
636.090 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 10
of this act, the Board may employ:
(a) Agents and inspectors to secure evidence of, and report on,
violations of this chapter.
(b) Attorneys, investigators, consultants and other professional
and clerical personnel necessary to administer this chapter.
2. The Attorney General may act as counsel for the Board
subject to the provisions of NRS 622A.200.
Sec. 68. NRS 636.338 is hereby amended to read as follows:
636.338 1. The Executive Director of the Board or his or her
designee shall review and evaluate any complaint or information
received from the Investigation Division of the Department of
Public Safety or the State Board of Pharmacy, including, without
limitation, information provided pursuant to NRS 453.164, or from
a law enforcement agency, professional licensing board or any other
source indicating that:
(a) A licensee has issued a fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or
otherwise inappropriate prescription for a controlled substance listed
in schedule III or IV;
(b) A pattern of prescriptions issued by a licensee indicates that
the licensee has issued prescriptions in the manner described in
paragraph (a); or
(c) A patient of a licensee has acquired, used or possessed a
controlled substance listed in schedule III or IV in a fraudulent,
illegal, unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate manner.
2. If the Executive Director of the Board or his or her designee
receives information described in subsection 1 concerning the
licensee, the Executive Director or his or her designee must notify
the licensee as soon as practicable after receiving the information.
3. A review and evaluation conducted pursuant to subsection 1
must include, without limitation:
(a) A review of relevant information contained in the database
of the program established pursuant to NRS 453.162; and
-
*AB601*

– 35 –
(b) A request for additional relevant information from the
licensee who is the subject of the review and evaluation.
4. If, after a review and evaluation conducted pursuant to
subsection 1, the Executive Director or his or her designee
determines that a licensee may have issued a fraudulent, illegal,
unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate prescription for a controlled
substance listed in schedule III or IV, the Board must proceed as if a
written complaint had been filed against the licensee. If, after
conducting an investigation and a hearing in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter, the Board determines that the licensee
issued a fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate
prescription, the Board must impose appropriate disciplinary action.
5. When deemed appropriate, the Executive Director of the
Board may:
(a) Refer information acquired during a review and evaluation
conducted pursuant to subsection 1 to another professional licensing
board, law enforcement agency or other appropriate governmental
entity for investigation and criminal or administrative proceedings.
(b) Postpone any notification, review or part of such a review
required by this section if he or she determines that it is necessary to
avoid interfering with any pending administrative or criminal
investigation into the suspected fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or
otherwise inappropriate prescribing, dispensing or use of a
controlled substance.
6. The Board shall:
(a) Adopt regulations providing for disciplinary action against a
licensee for inappropriately prescribing a controlled substance listed
in schedule III or IV or violating the provisions of NRS 639.2391 to
639.23916, inclusive, and any regulations adopted by the State
Board of Pharmacy pursuant thereto. Such disciplinary action must
include, without limitation, requiring the licensee to complete
additional continuing education concerning prescribing controlled
substances listed in schedules III and IV.
(b) Develop and disseminate to each optometrist who is certified
to prescribe and administer pharmaceutical agents pursuant to NRS
636.288 or make available on the Internet website [of the Board]
maintained by the Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and
Councils Standards of the Department of Business and Industry
pursuant to section 13 of this act an explanation or a technical
advisory bulletin to inform those optometrists of the requirements of
this section and NRS 636.339, 639.23507 and 639.2391 to
639.23916, inclusive, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
The Board shall update the explanation or bulletin as necessary to
include any revisions to those provisions of law or regulations. The
explanation or bulletin must include, without limitation, an
-
*AB601*

– 36 –
explanation of the requirements that apply to specific controlled
substances or categories of controlled substances.
Sec. 69. NRS 637.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637.040 1. The Board shall:
(a) Elect a [President, Vice President, Secretary and] Treasurer
from its membership; and
(b) Meet at least once each year on a date determined by the
Board.
2. A majority of the members of the Board constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of business of the Board.
3. The Board shall operate on the basis of a fiscal year
commencing on July 1 and terminating on June 30.
Sec. 70. NRS 637.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637.050 The Board may:
1. Maintain offices in as many locations in the State as it finds
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter;
2. Employ and fix the compensation of an Executive Director
and , except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this act, any
other employees, including, without limitation, investigators,
lobbyists, attorneys, other professional consultants and clerical
personnel the Board deems necessary to carry out the provisions of
this chapter;
3. [Contract] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of
this act, contract with professional consultants and service
providers, including, without limitation, investigators, lobbyists and
attorneys, as the Board deems necessary to carry out the provisions
of this chapter; and
4. Transact any other business necessary to carry out the
provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 71. NRS 637B.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.120 1. [The Board shall elect from its members a Chair
and Vice Chair. The officers of the Board hold their respective
offices at the pleasure of the Board.
2.] The Board shall meet at least twice annually and may meet
at other times on the call of the [Chair] President or a majority of its
members.
[3.] 2. A majority of the Board constitutes a quorum to
transact all business.
[4.] 3. The Board shall comply with the provisions of chapter
241 of NRS, and all meetings of the Board must be conducted in
accordance with that chapter.
Sec. 72. NRS 637B.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.130 1. A member of the Board is entitled to receive:
(a) A salary of not more than $150 per day, as fixed by the
Board, while engaged in the business of the Board; and
-
*AB601*

– 37 –
(b) A per diem allowance and travel expenses at a rate fixed by
the Board, while engaged in the business of the Board. The rate
must not exceed the rate provided for state officers and employees
generally.
2. While engaged in the business of the Board, each employee
of the Board is entitled to receive a per diem allowance and travel
expenses at a rate fixed by the Board. The rate must not exceed the
rate provided for state officers and employees generally.
3. The Board may employ and fix the compensation of an
Executive Director and , except as otherwise provided in section 10
of this act, any other employee necessary to the discharge of its
duties.
4. The expenses of the Board and members of the Board, and
the salaries of its employees, must be paid from the fees received by
the Board pursuant to this chapter, and no part of those expenses and
salaries may be paid out of the State General Fund.
Sec. 73. NRS 637B.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.310 1. The Board through its [Chair] President or Vice
[Chair] President may maintain in any court of competent
jurisdiction a suit for an injunction against any person engaging in
the practice of audiology, speech-language pathology or fitting and
dispensing hearing aids without a license valid under this chapter.
2. Such an injunction:
(a) May be issued without proof of actual damage sustained by
any person, this provision being a preventive as well as a punitive
measure.
(b) Shall not relieve such person from criminal prosecution for
practicing without a license.
Sec. 74. NRS 638.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
638.050 1. [The Board shall elect from its appointed
members a President and Vice President, who serve at the pleasure
of the Board.
2.] The Board may elect from its appointed members at least
one member to act as a representative of the Board at any meeting
held within the State or outside the State when the Board considers
such representation beneficial.
[3.] 2. The Board shall:
(a) Employ an Executive Director, who shall maintain a copy of
all correspondence;
(b) Adopt regulations concerning the duties and qualifications of
the Executive Director; and
(c) At least annually, review the performance of the Executive
Director.
-
*AB601*

– 38 –
Sec. 75. NRS 638.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
638.070 1. The Board shall adopt regulations providing an
administrative fine in an amount not to exceed $500 if an applicant
for a license or the renewal of a license:
(a) Intentionally or knowingly makes a false or misleading
statement on an application; or
(b) Fails to inform the Board of any change of information
which was contained in an application.
2. The Board may adopt regulations:
(a) Necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter;
(b) Concerning the rights and responsibilities of veterinary
interns and externs and graduates of schools of veterinary medicine
located outside the United States or Canada;
(c) Concerning the rights and responsibilities of a veterinarian’s
employees who are not licensed nor working towards obtaining a
license pursuant to this chapter and whose duties require them to
spend a substantial portion of their time in direct contact with
animals;
(d) Concerning requirements for continuing education;
(e) Establishing procedures to approve schools which confer the
degree of veterinary technician or its equivalent;
(f) Concerning the disposition of animals which are abandoned
or left unclaimed at the office of a veterinarian;
(g) Establishing sanitary requirements for facilities in which
veterinary medicine is practiced, including, but not limited to,
precautions to be taken to prevent the creation or spread of any
infectious or contagious disease; and
(h) Concerning alternative veterinary medicine, including, but
not limited to, acupuncture, chiropractic procedures, dentistry,
cosmetic surgery, holistic medicine, and the provision of such
services by a licensed provider of health care under the direction of
a licensed veterinarian.
3. [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this
act, the Board may:
(a) Employ attorneys, investigators, hearing officers for
disciplinary hearings, and other professional consultants and clerical
personnel necessary to the discharge of its duties;
(b) Conduct investigations and take and record evidence as to
any matter cognizable by it;
(c) Maintain offices in as many localities in the State as it
considers necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter; and
(d) Purchase or rent any office space, equipment and supplies
that it considers necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
-
*AB601*

– 39 –
Sec. 76. NRS 638.1419 is hereby amended to read as follows:
638.1419 The Board shall appoint one of its members to
conduct the investigation of a complaint. The member conducting
the investigation may request assistance from the Attorney General
or the Executive Director of the Board, and may , except as
otherwise provided in section 10 of this act, employ investigators,
professional consultants and any other personnel necessary to
conduct the investigation.
Sec. 77. NRS 639.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
639.040 1. [The] In addition to the officers required to be
elected by section 15 of this act, the Board shall elect [a President
and] a Treasurer from among its members.
2. The Board shall employ an Executive Secretary, who is not
a member of the Board. The Executive Secretary must have
experience as a licensed pharmacist in this State or in another state
with comparable licensing requirements. The Executive Secretary
shall keep a complete record of all proceedings of the Board and of
all certificates issued, and shall perform such other duties as the
Board may require, for which services the Executive Secretary is
entitled to receive a salary to be determined by the Board.
Sec. 78. NRS 639.063 is hereby amended to read as follows:
639.063 1. The Board shall prepare an annual report
concerning drugs that are returned or transferred to pharmacies
pursuant to NRS 433.801, 435.700, 449.2485, 639.2675 and
639.2676 and are reissued to fill other prescriptions. The report must
include, without limitation:
(a) The number of drugs that are returned to dispensing
pharmacies.
(b) The number of drugs that are transferred to nonprofit
pharmacies designated by the Board pursuant to NRS 639.2676.
(c) The number of drugs that are reissued to fill other
prescriptions.
(d) An estimate of the amount of money saved by reissuing such
drugs to fill other prescriptions.
(e) Any other information that the Board deems necessary.
2. The report must be:
(a) Available for public inspection during regular business hours
at the office of the Board; and
(b) Posted on [a] the Internet website [or other Internet site that
is operated or administered by or on behalf of the Board.]
maintained by the Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and
Councils Standards of the Department of Business and Industry
pursuant to section 13 of this act.
-
*AB601*

– 40 –
Sec. 79. NRS 639.067 is hereby amended to read as follows:
639.067 The Board shall post on [a] the Internet website [or
other Internet site that is operated or administered by or on behalf of
the Board:] maintained by the Office of Nevada Boards,
Commissions and Councils Standards of the Department of
Business and Industry pursuant to section 13 of this act:
1. A general description of the basic elements of the
Compliance Program Guidance for Pharmaceutical Manufacturers
that is published by the Office of Inspector General of the United
States Department of Health and Human Services, or links to
websites or other Internet sites that are operated or administered by
or on behalf of the Office of Inspector General where such
information may be obtained;
2. A general description of the process for reporting unlawful
or unethical conduct by pharmaceutical manufacturers to the Office
of Inspector General, or links to websites or other Internet sites that
are operated or administered by or on behalf of the Office of
Inspector General where such information may be obtained; and
3. A current telephone number for the Office of Inspector
General.
Sec. 80. NRS 639.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
639.070 1. The Board may:
(a) Adopt such regulations, not inconsistent with the laws of this
State, as are necessary for the protection of the public, appertaining
to the practice of pharmacy and the lawful performance of its duties.
(b) Adopt regulations requiring that prices charged by retail
pharmacies for drugs and medicines which are obtained by
prescription be posted in the pharmacies and be given on the
telephone to persons requesting such information.
(c) Adopt regulations, not inconsistent with the laws of this
State, authorizing the Executive Secretary of the Board to issue
certificates, licenses and permits required by this chapter and
chapters 453 and 454 of NRS.
(d) Adopt regulations governing the dispensing of poisons,
drugs, chemicals and medicines.
(e) Regulate the practice of pharmacy.
(f) Regulate the sale and dispensing of poisons, drugs, chemicals
and medicines.
(g) Regulate the means of recordkeeping and storage, handling,
sanitation and security of drugs, poisons, medicines, chemicals and
devices, including, but not limited to, requirements relating to:
(1) Pharmacies, institutional pharmacies and pharmacies in
correctional institutions;
(2) Drugs stored in hospitals; and
(3) Drugs stored for the purpose of wholesale distribution.
-
*AB601*

– 41 –
(h) Examine and register, upon application, pharmacists and
other persons who dispense or distribute medications whom it
deems qualified.
(i) Charge and collect necessary and reasonable fees for the
expedited processing of a request or for any other incidental service
the Board provides, other than those specifically set forth in this
chapter.
(j) Maintain offices in as many localities in the State as it finds
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
(k) [Employ] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this
act, employ attorneys, inspectors, investigators and other
professional consultants and clerical personnel necessary to the
discharge of its duties.
(l) Enforce the provisions of NRS 453.011 to 453.552, inclusive,
and enforce the provisions of this chapter and chapter 454 of NRS.
(m) Adopt regulations concerning the information required to be
submitted in connection with an application for any license,
certificate or permit required by this chapter or chapter 453 or 454
of NRS.
(n) Adopt regulations concerning the education, experience and
background of a person who is employed by the holder of a license
or permit issued pursuant to this chapter and who has access to
drugs and devices.
(o) Adopt regulations concerning the use of computerized
mechanical equipment for the filling of prescriptions.
(p) Participate in and expend money for programs that enhance
the practice of pharmacy.
(q) Enter into written agreements with local, state and federal
agencies for the purpose of improving the enforcement of and
compliance with the provisions of this chapter and chapters 453 and
454 of NRS.
(r) Contract with a private entity to administer the database of
the program established pursuant to NRS 453.162.
2. The Board shall, to the extent feasible, communicate or
cooperate with or provide any documents or other information to
any other licensing board or any other agency that is investigating a
person, including, without limitation, a law enforcement agency.
3. This section does not authorize the Board to prohibit open-
market competition in the advertising and sale of prescription drugs
and pharmaceutical services.
Sec. 81. NRS 639.23288 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
639.23288 1. In addition to the requirements set forth in this
chapter and any other specific statute, an Internet pharmacy located:
-
*AB601*

– 42 –
(a) Within this State, shall not fill or refill a prescription or
otherwise engage in the practice of pharmacy for a person located
within or outside this State unless the Internet pharmacy is certified
by the Board.
(b) Outside this State, shall not fill or refill a prescription or
otherwise engage in the practice of pharmacy for a person located
within this State unless the Internet pharmacy is certified by the
Board.
2. The Board shall adopt regulations prescribing standards for
certifying an Internet pharmacy. The standards adopted by the
Board may be based upon standards adopted by the National
Association of Boards of Pharmacy or some other association or
organization that provides standards for certifying an Internet
pharmacy.
3. The Board shall post on [a] the Internet website [or other
Internet site that is operated or administered by or on behalf of the
Board:] maintained by the Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions
and Councils Standards of the Department of Business and
Industry pursuant to section 13 of this act:
(a) A list of Internet pharmacies certified by the Board; and
(b) Any other information relating to Internet pharmacies that
the Board deems relevant.
Sec. 82. NRS 639.23916 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
639.23916 1. The Board may adopt any regulations
necessary or convenient to enforce the provisions of NRS
639.23507 and 639.2391 to 639.23916, inclusive. Such regulations
may impose additional requirements concerning the prescription of
a controlled substance listed in schedule II, III or IV by a
practitioner, other than a veterinarian, for the treatment of pain.
2. The Board shall develop and disseminate to each
professional licensing board that licenses a practitioner, other than a
veterinarian, or make available on the Internet website [of the
Board] maintained by the Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions
and Councils Standards of the Department of Business and
Industry pursuant to section 13 of this act an explanation or a
technical advisory bulletin to inform those professional licensing
boards of the requirements of NRS 639.23507 and 639.2391 to
639.23916, inclusive, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
The Board shall update the explanation or bulletin as necessary to
include any revisions to those provisions of law or regulations. The
explanation or bulletin must include, without limitation, an
explanation of the requirements that apply to specific controlled
substances or categories of controlled substances.
-
*AB601*

– 43 –
3. A practitioner who violates any provision of NRS 639.23507
and 639.2391 to 639.23916, inclusive, or any regulations adopted
pursuant thereto is:
(a) Not guilty of a misdemeanor; and
(b) Subject to professional discipline.
Sec. 83. NRS 639.2596 is hereby amended to read as follows:
639.2596 The Board shall [maintain a link] post on [its] the
Internet website maintained by the Office of Nevada Boards,
Commissions and Councils Standards of the Department of
Business and Industry pursuant to section 13 of this act a link to
the Purple Book: Lists of Licensed Biological Products with
Reference Product Exclusivity and Biosimilarity or
Interchangeability Evaluations, published by the Food and Drug
Administration.
Sec. 84. NRS 639.28078 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
639.28078 1. A pharmacist may dispense a self-administered
hormonal contraceptive under the protocol established pursuant to
NRS 639.28077 to a patient, regardless of whether the patient has
obtained a prescription from a practitioner.
2. A pharmacist must provide the risk assessment questionnaire
prescribed by the Board pursuant to NRS 639.28077 to a patient
who requests a self-administered hormonal contraceptive before
dispensing the self-administered hormonal contraceptive to the
patient. If the patient completes the questionnaire and the results of
the questionnaire indicate that it is unsafe to dispense the self-
administered hormonal contraceptive to the patient, the pharmacist:
(a) Must not dispense the self-administered hormonal
contraceptive; and
(b) Must refer the patient to the patient’s attending provider or
another qualified provider of health care.
3. A pharmacist who dispenses a self-administered hormonal
contraceptive under the protocol shall:
(a) Create a record concerning the dispensing of the self-
administered hormonal contraceptive which includes, without
limitation, the name of the patient to whom the self-administered
hormonal contraceptive was dispensed, the type of self-administered
hormonal contraceptive dispensed and any other relevant
information required by the protocol prescribed pursuant to NRS
639.28077. The pharmacist or his or her employer shall maintain the
record for the amount of time prescribed in that protocol.
(b) Inform the patient to whom the self-administered hormonal
contraceptive is dispensed concerning:
(1) Proper administration and storage of the self-
administered hormonal contraceptive;
-
*AB601*

– 44 –
(2) Potential side effects of the self-administered hormonal
contraceptive; and
(3) The need to use other methods of contraception, if
appropriate.
(c) Provide to the patient to whom the self-administered
hormonal contraceptive is dispensed:
(1) The written record required by subsection 4; and
(2) Any written information required by the regulations
adopted pursuant to NRS 639.28077.
(d) Comply with the regulations adopted pursuant to NRS
639.28077 and any guidelines for dispensing the self-administered
hormonal contraceptive recommended by the manufacturer.
4. A pharmacist shall provide to any patient who requests a
self-administered hormonal contraceptive under the protocol a
written record of the request, regardless of whether the self-
administered hormonal contraceptive is dispensed. The record must
include, without limitation:
(a) A copy of the risk assessment questionnaire if completed by
the patient pursuant to subsection 2; and
(b) A written record of the self-administered hormonal
contraceptive requested and any self-administered hormonal
contraceptive dispensed.
5. Any pharmacy that wishes to dispense self-administered
hormonal contraceptives under the protocol must notify the Board of
that fact. The Board shall post on [an] the Internet website
maintained by the [Board] Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions
and Councils Standards of the Department of Business and
Industry pursuant to section 13 of this act a list of the names,
addresses and contact information of pharmacies that have provided
such notice.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Attending provider” means a provider of health care who
provides or has provided care to the patient.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 85. NRS 639.570 is hereby amended to read as follows:
639.570 1. A wholesaler or manufacturer who employs a
person to sell or market a drug, medicine, chemical, device or
appliance in this State shall:
(a) Adopt a written marketing code of conduct which establishes
the practices and standards that govern the marketing and sale of its
products. The marketing code of conduct must be based on
applicable legal standards and incorporate principles of health care,
including, without limitation, requirements that the activities of the
wholesaler or manufacturer be intended to benefit patients, enhance
-
*AB601*

– 45 –
the practice of medicine and not interfere with the independent
judgment of health care professionals. Adoption of the most recent
version of the Code on Interactions with Healthcare Professionals
developed by the Pharmaceutical Research and Manufacturers of
America satisfies the requirements of this paragraph.
(b) Adopt a training program to provide regular training to
appropriate employees, including, without limitation, all sales and
marketing staff, on the marketing code of conduct.
(c) Conduct annual audits to monitor compliance with the
marketing code of conduct.
(d) Adopt policies and procedures for investigating instances of
noncompliance with the marketing code of conduct, including,
without limitation, the maintenance of effective lines of
communication for employees to report noncompliance, the
investigation of reports of noncompliance, the taking of corrective
action in response to noncompliance and the reporting of instances
of noncompliance to law enforcement authorities in appropriate
circumstances.
(e) Identify a compliance officer responsible for developing,
operating and monitoring the marketing code of conduct.
2. A wholesaler or manufacturer who employs a person to sell
or market a drug, medicine, chemical, device or appliance in this
State shall submit to the Board annually:
(a) A copy of its marketing code of conduct;
(b) A description of its training program;
(c) A description of its investigation policies;
(d) The name, title, address, telephone number and electronic
mail address of its compliance officer; and
(e) Certification that it has conducted its annual audit and is in
compliance with its marketing code of conduct.
3. On or before January 15 of each odd-numbered year, the
Board shall prepare and submit to the Governor, and to the Director
of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature,
a compilation of the information submitted to the Board pursuant to
this section, other than any information identified as a trade secret in
the information submitted to the Board.
4. The Board:
(a) Shall adopt regulations providing for the time of the
submission and the form of the information required pursuant to this
section and defining “compliance” for the purposes of this section.
(b) May not require the disclosure of the results of an audit
conducted pursuant to this section.
(c) Shall post on [its] the Internet website maintained by the
Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and Councils Standards of
the Department of Business and Industry pursuant to section 13 of
-
*AB601*

– 46 –
this act information concerning the compliance of all wholesalers
and manufacturers with the requirements of this section.
(d) Shall not disclose any proprietary or confidential business
information that it receives pursuant to this section.
Sec. 86. NRS 640.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640.050 1. The Board shall:
(a) Enforce the provisions of this chapter and any regulations
adopted pursuant thereto;
(b) Evaluate the qualifications and determine the eligibility of an
applicant for a license as a physical therapist or physical therapist
assistant and, upon payment of the applicable fee, issue the
appropriate license to a qualified applicant;
(c) Investigate any complaint filed with the Board against a
licensee; and
(d) Unless the Board determines that extenuating circumstances
exist, forward to the appropriate law enforcement agency any
substantiated information submitted to the Board concerning a
person who practices as a physical therapist or physical therapist
assistant without a license.
2. The Board may adopt reasonable regulations to carry this
chapter into effect, including, but not limited to, regulations
concerning the:
(a) Issuance and display of licenses.
(b) Supervision of physical therapist assistants and physical
therapist technicians.
3. The Board shall adopt regulations establishing:
(a) The qualifications a physical therapist must obtain before he
or she is authorized to perform dry needling, which must include,
without limitation, the successful completion of not less than 150
hours of didactic education and training in dry needling approved by
the Board. Such hours may include didactic education and training
completed as part of a graduate-level program of study.
(b) Procedures concerning the handling of needles used to
perform dry needling, including, without limitation, procedures for
the disposal of a needle after a single use.
(c) Procedures to ensure that a physical therapist does not
engage in needle retention.
4. The Board shall prepare and maintain a record of its
proceedings, including, without limitation, any disciplinary
proceedings.
5. The Board shall maintain a list of licensed physical
therapists authorized to practice physical therapy and physical
therapist assistants licensed to assist in the practice of
physical therapy in this State.
6. The Board may:
-
*AB601*

– 47 –
(a) Maintain offices in as many localities in the State as it finds
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
(b) [Employ] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this
act, employ attorneys, investigators and other professional
consultants and clerical personnel necessary to the discharge of its
duties.
(c) Adopt a seal of which a court may take judicial notice.
7. Any member or agent of the Board may enter any premises
in this State where a person who holds a license issued pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter practices physical therapy or as a
physical therapist assistant and inspect the premises to determine
whether a violation of any provision of this chapter or any
regulation adopted pursuant thereto has occurred, including, without
limitation, an inspection to determine whether any person at the
premises is practicing physical therapy or as a physical therapist
assistant without the appropriate license issued pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter.
8. Any voting member of the Board may administer an oath to
a person testifying in a matter that relates to the duties of the Board.
Sec. 87. NRS 640.145 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640.145 1. The Board may issue a license by endorsement as
a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant to an applicant
who meets the requirements set forth in this section. An applicant
may submit to the Board an application for such a license if the
applicant holds a corresponding valid and unrestricted license as a
physical therapist or physical therapist assistant, as applicable, in the
District of Columbia or any state or territory of the United States.
2. An applicant for a license by endorsement pursuant to this
section must submit to the Board with his or her application:
(a) Proof satisfactory to the Board that the applicant:
(1) Satisfies the requirements of subsection 1;
(2) Has not been disciplined and is not currently being
investigated by the corresponding regulatory authority of the
District of Columbia or any state or territory in which the applicant
currently holds or has held a license as a physical therapist or
physical therapist assistant; and
(3) Has not been held civilly or criminally liable for
malpractice in the District of Columbia or any state or territory of
the United States;
(b) A complete set of fingerprints and written permission
authorizing the Board to forward the fingerprints in the manner
provided in NRS 640.090;
(c) An affidavit stating that the information contained in the
application and any accompanying material is true and correct;
-
*AB601*

– 48 –
(d) A fee in the amount of the fee set by a regulation of the
Board pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 640.090 for
an application for a license; and
(e) Any other information required by the Board.
3. Not later than 15 business days after receiving an application
for a license by endorsement pursuant to this section, the Board
shall provide written notice to the applicant of any additional
information required by the Board to consider the application.
Unless the Board denies the application for good cause, the Board
shall approve the application and issue a license by endorsement to
the applicant not later than:
(a) Forty-five days after receiving the application; or
(b) Ten days after the Board receives a report on the applicant’s
background based on the submission of the applicant’s fingerprints,
 whichever occurs later.
4. A license by endorsement may be issued at a meeting of the
Board or between its meetings by the [Chair] President of the Board
or his or her designee. Such an action shall be deemed to be an
action of the Board.
Sec. 88. NRS 640.146 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640.146 1. The Board may issue a license by endorsement as
a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant to an applicant
who meets the requirements set forth in this section. An applicant
may submit to the Board an application for such a license if the
applicant:
(a) Holds a corresponding valid and unrestricted license as a
physical therapist or physical therapist assistant in the District of
Columbia or any state or territory of the United States; and
(b) Is an active member of, or the spouse of an active member
of, the Armed Forces of the United States, a veteran or the surviving
spouse of a veteran.
2. An applicant for a license by endorsement pursuant to this
section must submit to the Board with his or her application:
(a) Proof satisfactory to the Board that the applicant:
(1) Satisfies the requirements of subsection 1;
(2) Has not been disciplined and is not currently being
investigated by the corresponding regulatory authority of the
District of Columbia or the state or territory in which the applicant
holds a license as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant;
and
(3) Has not been held civilly or criminally liable for
malpractice in the District of Columbia or any state or territory of
the United States;
-
*AB601*

– 49 –
(b) A complete set of fingerprints and written permission
authorizing the Board to forward the fingerprints in the manner
provided in NRS 640.090;
(c) An affidavit stating that the information contained in the
application and any accompanying material is true and correct;
(d) A fee in the amount set by a regulation of the Board pursuant
to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 640.090 for an application
for a license; and
(e) Any other information required by the Board.
3. Not later than 15 business days after receiving an application
for a license by endorsement pursuant to this section, the Board
shall provide written notice to the applicant of any additional
information required by the Board to consider the application.
Unless the Board denies the application for good cause, the Board
shall approve the application and issue a license by endorsement to
the applicant not later than:
(a) Forty-five days after receiving all the additional information
required by the Board to complete the application; or
(b) Ten days after the Board receives a report on the applicant’s
background based on the submission of the applicant’s fingerprints,
 whichever occurs later.
4. A license by endorsement may be issued at a meeting of the
Board or between its meetings by the [Chair] President of the Board
or his or her designee. Such an action shall be deemed to be an
action of the Board.
5. At any time before making a final decision on an application
for a license by endorsement pursuant to this section, the Board may
grant a provisional license authorizing an applicant to practice as a
physical therapist or physical therapist assistant, as applicable, in
accordance with regulations adopted by the Board.
6. As used in this section, “veteran” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 417.005.
Sec. 89. NRS 640A.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640A.090 1. The Board shall:
(a) Hold at least two meetings a year at the call of the [Chair]
President or upon the written request of two or more members.
(b) [Elect a Chair at the first regular meeting of each year.
(c)] Comply with the provisions of chapter 241 of NRS.
2. A majority of the members of the Board constitutes a
quorum.
Sec. 90. NRS 640A.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640A.100 1. Each member of the Board is entitled to receive:
(a) A salary of not more than $150 per day, as fixed by the
Board, while engaged in the business of the Board; and
-
*AB601*

– 50 –
(b) A per diem allowance and travel expenses, at a rate fixed by
the Board, while engaged in the business of the Board. The rate
must not exceed the rate provided for state officers and employees
generally.
2. The Board may employ an Executive Director and , except
as otherwise provided in section 10 of this act, employ any other
employees it deems necessary, establish their duties and fix their
salaries.
3. The expenses of the Board and members of the Board, and
the salaries of its employees, must be paid from the fees received by
the Board pursuant to this chapter, and no part of those expenses and
salaries may be paid out of the State General Fund.
Sec. 91. NRS 640A.165 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640A.165 1. The Board may issue a license by endorsement
as an occupational therapist to an applicant who meets the
requirements set forth in this section. An applicant may submit to
the Board an application for such a license if the applicant satisfies
the requirements set forth in NRS 640A.120 and holds a
corresponding valid and unrestricted license as an occupational
therapist in the District of Columbia or any state or territory of the
United States.
2. An applicant for a license by endorsement pursuant to this
section must submit to the Board with his or her application:
(a) Proof satisfactory to the Board that the applicant:
(1) Satisfies the requirements of subsection 1;
(2) Has not been disciplined or investigated by the
corresponding regulatory authority of the District of Columbia or
any state or territory in which the applicant currently holds or has
held a license as an occupational therapist; and
(3) Has not been held civilly or criminally liable for
malpractice in the District of Columbia or any state or territory of
the United States;
(b) An affidavit stating that the information contained in the
application and any accompanying material is true and correct;
(c) A fee in the amount of the fee set by a regulation of the
Board pursuant to NRS 640A.190 for the initial issuance of a
license; and
(d) Any other information required by the Board.
3. Not later than 15 business days after receiving an application
for a license by endorsement as an occupational therapist pursuant
to this section, the Board shall provide written notice to the
applicant of any additional information required by the Board to
consider the application. Unless the Board denies the application for
good cause, the Board shall approve the application and issue a
-
*AB601*

– 51 –
license by endorsement as an occupational therapist to the applicant
not later than 45 days after receiving the application.
4. A license by endorsement as an occupational therapist may
be issued at a meeting of the Board or between its meetings by the
[Chair] President of the Board. Such an action shall be deemed to
be an action of the Board.
Sec. 92. NRS 640A.166 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640A.166 1. The Board may issue a license by endorsement
as an occupational therapist to an applicant who meets the
requirements set forth in this section. An applicant may submit to
the Board an application for such a license if the applicant:
(a) Holds a corresponding valid and unrestricted license as an
occupational therapist in the District of Columbia or any state or
territory of the United States;
(b) Meets the requirements set forth in NRS 640A.120; and
(c) Is an active member of, or the spouse of an active member
of, the Armed Forces of the United States, a veteran or the surviving
spouse of a veteran.
2. An applicant for a license by endorsement pursuant to this
section must submit to the Board with his or her application:
(a) Proof satisfactory to the Board that the applicant:
(1) Satisfies the requirements of subsection 1;
(2) Has not been disciplined or investigated by the
corresponding regulatory authority of the District of Columbia or
the state or territory in which the applicant holds a license as an
occupational therapist; and
(3) Has not been held civilly or criminally liable for
malpractice in the District of Columbia or any state or territory of
the United States;
(b) An affidavit stating that the information contained in the
application and any accompanying material is true and correct;
(c) A fee in the amount set by a regulation of the Board pursuant
to NRS 640A.190 for the initial issuance of a license; and
(d) Any other information required by the Board.
3. Not later than 15 business days after receiving an application
for a license by endorsement as an occupational therapist pursuant
to this section, the Board shall provide written notice to the
applicant of any additional information required by the Board to
consider the application. Unless the Board denies the application for
good cause, the Board shall approve the application and issue a
license by endorsement as an occupational therapist to the applicant
not later than 45 days after receiving all the additional information
required by the Board to complete the application.
4. A license by endorsement as an occupational therapist may
be issued at a meeting of the Board or between its meetings by the
-
*AB601*

– 52 –
[Chair] President of the Board. Such an action shall be deemed to
be an action of the Board.
5. At any time before making a final decision on an application
for a license by endorsement pursuant to this section, the Board may
grant a provisional license authorizing an applicant to practice as an
occupational therapist in accordance with regulations adopted by the
Board.
6. As used in this section, “veteran” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 417.005.
Sec. 93. NRS 640A.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640A.210 1. In a manner consistent with the provisions of
chapter 622A of NRS, the Board may conduct investigations, hold
hearings and examine witnesses in carrying out its duties pursuant to
this chapter. For the purposes of this chapter:
(a) Any member of the Board may administer oaths; and
(b) The [Chair] President of the Board may issue subpoenas to
compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and
papers.
2. If any person fails to comply with the subpoena within 10
days after its issuance, the [Chair] President of the Board may
petition the district court for an order of the court compelling
compliance with the subpoena.
3. Upon such a petition, the court shall enter an order directing
the person subpoenaed to appear before the court at a time and place
to be fixed by the court in its order, the time to be not more than 10
days after the date of the order, and to show cause why the person
has not complied with the subpoena. A certified copy of the order
must be served upon the person subpoenaed.
4. If it appears to the court that the subpoena was regularly
issued by the Board, the court shall enter an order compelling
compliance with the subpoena, and upon failure to obey the order
the person must be dealt with as for contempt of court.
Sec. 94. NRS 640B.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640B.190 1. The Board shall [:
(a) Elect from its members a Chair at the first meeting of each
year; and
(b) Meet] meet at least three times each year at the call of the
[Chair] President of the Board, or upon the written request of at
least three members of the Board.
2. A majority of the members of the Board constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of the business of the Board.
Sec. 95. NRS 640B.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640B.200 1. The Board may employ an Executive Secretary
and , except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this act, employ
any other persons necessary to carry out its duties.
-
*AB601*

– 53 –
2. The members of the Board are not entitled to receive a
salary.
3. While engaged in the business of the Board, each member
and employee of the Board is entitled to receive a per diem
allowance and travel expenses at a rate fixed by the Board. The rate
must not exceed the rate provided for officers and employees of this
State generally.
Sec. 96. NRS 640B.720 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640B.720 1. In a manner consistent with the provisions of
chapter 622A of NRS, the Board may conduct investigations and
hold hearings to carry out its duties pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter.
2. In such a hearing:
(a) Any member of the Board may administer oaths and
examine witnesses; and
(b) The Board or any member thereof may issue subpoenas to
compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and
papers.
3. Each witness who is subpoenaed to appear before the Board
is entitled to receive for his or her attendance the same fees and
mileage allowed by law to a witness in a civil case. The amount
must be paid by the party who requested the subpoena. If any
witness who has not been required to attend at the request of any
party is subpoenaed by the Board, his or her fees and mileage must
be paid from the money of the Board.
4. If any person fails to comply with the subpoena within 10
days after it is issued, the [Chair] President of the Board may
petition a court of competent jurisdiction for an order of the court
compelling compliance with the subpoena.
5. Upon such a petition, the court shall enter an order directing
the person subpoenaed to appear before the court at a time and place
to be fixed by the court in its order, the time to be not more than 10
days after the date of the order, and to show cause why the person
has not complied with the subpoena. A certified copy of the order
must be served upon the person subpoenaed.
6. If it appears to the court that the subpoena was regularly
issued by the Board, the court shall enter an order compelling
compliance with the subpoena. The failure of the person to obey the
order is a contempt of the court that issued the order.
Sec. 97. NRS 640C.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640C.180 1. [At the first meeting of each fiscal year, the
members of the Board shall elect a Chair, Vice Chair and Secretary-
Treasurer from among the members.
-
*AB601*

– 54 –
2.] The Board shall meet at least quarterly and may meet at
other times at the call of the [Chair] President or upon the written
request of a majority of the members of the Board.
[3.] 2. The Board shall alternate the location of its meetings
between the southern district of Nevada and the northern district of
Nevada. For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) The southern district of Nevada consists of all that portion of
the State lying within the boundaries of the counties of Clark,
Esmeralda, Lincoln and Nye.
(b) The northern district of Nevada consists of all that portion of
the State lying within the boundaries of Carson City and the
counties of Churchill, Douglas, Elko, Eureka, Humboldt, Lander,
Lyon, Mineral, Pershing, Storey, Washoe and White Pine.
[4.] 3. A meeting of the Board may be conducted
telephonically or by videoconferencing. A meeting conducted
telephonically or by videoconferencing must meet the requirements
of chapter 241 of NRS and any other applicable provisions of law.
[5.] 4. Five members of the Board constitute a quorum for the
purposes of transacting the business of the Board, including, without
limitation, issuing, renewing, suspending, revoking or reinstating a
license issued pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 98. NRS 640C.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640C.210 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in section
10 of this act, the Board may employ or contract with inspectors,
investigators, advisers, examiners and clerks and any other persons
required to carry out its duties and secure the services of attorneys
and other professional consultants as it may deem necessary to carry
out the provisions of this chapter.
2. Each employee of the Board is an at-will employee who
serves at the pleasure of the Board. The Board may discharge an
employee of the Board for any reason that does not violate public
policy, including, without limitation, making a false representation
to the Board.
Sec. 99. NRS 640C.426 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640C.426 1. The Board may issue a license by endorsement
to practice massage therapy, reflexology or structural integration to
an applicant who meets the requirements set forth in this section. An
applicant may submit to the Board an application for such a license
if the applicant:
(a) Holds a corresponding valid and unrestricted license to
practice massage therapy, reflexology or structural integration in the
District of Columbia or any state or territory of the United States;
and
-
*AB601*

– 55 –
(b) Is an active member of, or the spouse of an active member
of, the Armed Forces of the United States, a veteran or the surviving
spouse of a veteran.
2. An applicant for a license by endorsement pursuant to this
section must submit to the Board with his or her application:
(a) Proof satisfactory to the Board that the applicant:
(1) Satisfies the requirements of subsection 1;
(2) Has not been disciplined or investigated by the
corresponding regulatory authority of the District of Columbia or
the state or territory in which the applicant holds a license to
practice massage therapy, reflexology or structural integration; and
(3) Has not been held civilly or criminally liable for
malpractice in the District of Columbia or any state or territory of
the United States;
(b) A complete set of fingerprints and written permission
authorizing the Board to forward the fingerprints in the manner
provided in NRS 640C.580;
(c) An affidavit stating that the information contained in the
application and any accompanying material is true and correct;
(d) The fees prescribed by the Board pursuant to NRS 640C.520
for the application for and initial issuance of a license; and
(e) Any other information required by the Board.
3. Not later than 15 business days after receiving an application
for a license by endorsement to practice massage therapy,
reflexology or structural integration pursuant to this section, the
Board shall provide written notice to the applicant of any additional
information required by the Board to consider the application.
Unless the Board denies the application for good cause, the Board
shall approve the application and issue a license by endorsement to
practice massage therapy, reflexology or structural integration to the
applicant not later than:
(a) Forty-five days after receiving all additional information
required by the Board to complete the application; or
(b) Ten days after the Board receives a report on the applicant’s
background based on the submission of the applicant’s fingerprints,
 whichever occurs later.
4. A license by endorsement to practice massage therapy,
reflexology or structural integration may be issued at a meeting of
the Board or between its meetings by the [Chair] President and
Executive Director of the Board. Such an action shall be deemed to
be an action of the Board.
5. At any time before making a final decision on an application
for a license by endorsement, the Board may grant a provisional
license authorizing an applicant to practice as a massage therapist,
-
*AB601*

– 56 –
reflexologist or structural integration practitioner in accordance with
regulations adopted by the Board.
6. As used in this section, “veteran” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 417.005.
Sec. 100. NRS 640C.750 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
640C.750 1. The Board may conduct investigations and hold
hearings to carry out its duties pursuant to this chapter.
2. In such a hearing:
(a) Any member of the Board may administer oaths and
examine witnesses; and
(b) The Board or any member thereof may issue subpoenas to
compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and
papers.
3. Each witness who is subpoenaed to appear before the Board
is entitled to receive for his or her attendance the same fees and
mileage allowed by law for a witness in a civil case. The amount
must be paid by the party who requested the subpoena. If any
witness who has not been required to attend at the request of any
party is subpoenaed by the Board, his or her fees and mileage must
be paid by the Board from money available for that purpose.
4. If any person fails to comply with the subpoena within 10
days after it is issued, the [Chair] President of the Board may
petition a court of competent jurisdiction for an order of the court
compelling compliance with the subpoena.
5. Upon the filing of such a petition, the court shall enter an
order directing the person subpoenaed to appear before the court at a
time and place to be fixed by the court in its order, the time to be not
more than 10 days after the date of the order, and to show cause why
the person has not complied with the subpoena. A certified copy of
the order must be served upon the person subpoenaed.
6. If it appears to the court that the subpoena was regularly
issued by the Board, the court shall enter an order compelling
compliance with the subpoena. The failure of the person to comply
with the order is a contempt of the court that issued the order.
Sec. 101. NRS 641.115 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.115 1. The Board may:
(a) Maintain offices in as many localities in the State as it
considers necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
(b) [Employ] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this
act, employ attorneys, investigators, consultants, hearings officers
and employees necessary to the discharge of its duties.
2. Any expense incurred by the Board may not be paid out of
the State General Fund.
-
*AB601*

– 57 –
Sec. 102. NRS 641.117 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.117 The Board shall prescribe forms for applying for the
issuance or renewal of a license. The forms must:
1. Be available to be completed on the Internet website
maintained by the [Board;] Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions
and Councils Standards of the Department of Business and
Industry pursuant to section 13 of this act;
2. Provide immediate, automatic feedback to the applicant
concerning whether the applicant has submitted all required
information; and
3. Automatically store the data submitted by the applicant upon
completion of the application.
Sec. 103. NRS 641A.210 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641A.210 1. Each person desiring a license must apply to the
Board upon a form, and in a manner, prescribed by the Board. The
application must be accompanied by the fee for the application for
an initial license and the fee for the initial issuance of the license
prescribed by the Board, and all information required to complete
the application.
2. The Board shall prescribe forms for applying for the
issuance or renewal of a license. The forms must:
(a) Be available to be completed on the Internet website
maintained by the [Board;]
Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and Councils Standards of
the Department of Business and Industry pursuant to section 13 of
this act;
(b) Provide immediate, automatic feedback to the applicant
concerning whether the applicant has submitted all required
information; and
(c) Automatically store the data submitted by the applicant upon
completion of the application.
Sec. 104. NRS 641B.120 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641B.120 1. [The Board shall elect from its members a
President, a Vice President and a Secretary-Treasurer, who hold
their respective offices at its pleasure.
2. An election of officers must be held annually.
3.] The Board shall meet at least once in each quarter of the
year and may meet at other times at the call of the President or a
majority of its members.
[4.] 2. A majority of the Board constitutes a quorum to
transact all business.
-
*AB601*

– 58 –
Sec. 105. NRS 641B.180 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641B.180 The Board shall prescribe forms for applying for the
issuance or renewal of a license. The forms must:
1. Be available to be completed on the Internet website
maintained by the [Board;]
Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and Councils Standards of
the Department of Business and Industry pursuant to section 13 of
this act;
2. Provide immediate, automatic feedback to the applicant
concerning whether the applicant has submitted all required
information; and
3. Automatically store the data submitted by the applicant upon
completion of the application.
Sec. 106. NRS 641C.160 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641C.160 1. After the initial terms, the members of the Board
must be appointed to terms of 4 years and may not serve more than
two consecutive terms.
2. Upon the expiration of a term, the member continues to
serve on the Board until a qualified person has been appointed as a
successor.
3. The Governor may, after notice and hearing, remove any
member of the Board for misconduct, incompetence, neglect of duty
or any other sufficient cause.
4. The Board shall:
(a) [Elect annually from its members a President, Vice President
and Secretary-Treasurer.] If the President, Vice President or
Secretary-Treasurer is replaced by another person appointed by the
Governor, [the Board shall] elect from its members a replacement
for the President, Vice President or Secretary-Treasurer.
(b) Meet not less than twice a year and may meet at other times
at the call of the President or a majority of its members.
(c) Not incur any expenses that exceed the money received from
time to time as fees provided by the provisions of this chapter.
(d) Prepare and maintain a record of its transactions and
proceedings.
(e) Adopt a seal of which each court of this State shall take
judicial notice.
5. A majority of the members of the Board constitutes a
quorum to transact the business of the Board.
Sec. 107. NRS 641C.180 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641C.180 The Board may:
-
*AB601*

– 59 –
1. Maintain offices in as many locations in this State as it
considers necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
2. [Employ] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this
act, employ attorneys, investigators and other persons necessary to
carry out its duties.
Sec. 108. NRS 641C.205 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641C.205 The Board shall prescribe forms for applying for the
issuance or renewal of a license or certificate. The forms must:
1. Be available to be completed on the Internet website
maintained by the [Board;] Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions
and Councils Standards of the Department of Business and
Industry pursuant to section 13 of this act;
2. Provide immediate, automatic feedback to the applicant
concerning whether the applicant has submitted all required
information; and
3. Automatically store the data submitted by the applicant upon
completion of the application.
Sec. 109. NRS 641D.200 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641D.200 1. The Board of Applied Behavior Analysis is
hereby created.
2. The Governor shall appoint to the Board:
(a) Three voting members who are behavior analysts licensed in
this State.
(b) One voting member who is a behavior analyst or an assistant
behavior analyst licensed in this State.
(c) One voting member who is a representative of the general
public who is interested in the practice of applied behavior analysis.
This member must not be a behavior analyst or assistant behavior
analyst, an applicant or a former applicant for licensure as a
behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst, a member of a health
profession, the spouse or the parent or child, by blood, marriage or
adoption, of a behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst, or a
member of a household that includes a behavior analyst or assistant
behavior analyst.
3. After the initial term, the Governor shall appoint each
member of the Board to a term of 4 years. No member of the Board
may serve more than two consecutive terms.
4. The Board shall hold a regular meeting at least once a year.
The Board shall hold a special meeting upon a call of the President
or upon the request of a majority of the members. A majority of the
Board constitutes a quorum.
5. [At the regular annual meeting, the Board shall elect from its
membership a President and a Secretary-Treasurer, who shall hold
-
*AB601*

– 60 –
office for 1 year and until the election and qualification of their
successors.
6.] A member of the Board or an employee or agent of the
Board is not liable in a civil action for any act performed in good
faith and within the scope of the duties of the Board pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 110. NRS 641D.260 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641D.260 [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of
this act, the Board may contract with any appropriate public or
private agency, organization or institution in order to carry out the
provisions of this chapter. The purposes of such a contract may
include, without limitation:
1. To obtain assistance in processing applications for the
issuance or renewal of a license;
2. To obtain technical assistance;
3. To facilitate cooperation with another board or licensing
entity in this State or any other jurisdiction;
4. To obtain recommendations to improve and standardize
procedures used by the Board; and
5. To obtain assistance in identifying resources for improving
the operations of the Board.
Sec. 111. NRS 642.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
642.020 1. The Nevada Funeral and Cemetery Services
Board, consisting of seven members appointed by the Governor, is
hereby created.
2. The Governor shall appoint:
(a) Two members who are actively engaged as a funeral director
or embalmer.
(b) One member who is actively engaged as an operator of a
cemetery.
(c) One member who is actively engaged in the operation of a
crematory or direct cremation facility.
(d) Three members who are representatives of the general
public.
3. No member of the Board who is a representative of the
general public may:
(a) Be the holder of a license, permit or certificate issued by the
Board or be an applicant or former applicant for such a license,
permit or certificate.
(b) Be related within the third degree of consanguinity or
affinity to the holder of a license, permit or certificate issued by the
Board.
(c) Be employed by the holder of a license, permit or certificate
issued by the Board.
-
*AB601*

– 61 –
4. After the initial terms, members of the Board serve terms of
4 years, except when appointed to fill unexpired terms.
5. The [Chair] President of the Board must be chosen from the
members of the Board who are representatives of the general public.
Sec. 112. NRS 642.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
642.040 [1. The members of the Board shall have the power
to select from their number a Chair, a Secretary and a Treasurer.
2.] The Secretary of the Board shall keep:
[(a)] 1. A record of all the meetings of the Board.
[(b)] 2. A register of the names, residence addresses and
business addresses of all persons duly licensed under the provisions
of this chapter, and the numbers and dates of licenses. The register
shall be open to public examination at all reasonable times.
Sec. 113. NRS 642.055 is hereby amended to read as follows:
642.055 The Board shall:
1. Maintain a principal office in this State, and such other
offices in as many localities in the State as it finds necessary to carry
out the provisions of this chapter and chapters 451 and 452 of NRS.
2. Employ an Executive Director and , except as otherwise
provided in section 10 of this act, attorneys, investigators,
inspectors and other professional consultants and clerical personnel
necessary to the discharge of its duties.
3. Maintain all financial records, records relating to licenses,
certificates and permits, meeting minutes, notices and other public
documents of the Board in its principal office.
4. Establish minimum qualifications for the Executive
Director, attorneys, investigators, inspectors, and other professional
consultants and clerical personnel employed by the Board.
5. [Maintain an Internet website and post] Post on [that] the
Internet website maintained by the Office of Nevada Boards,
Commissions and Councils Standards of the Department of
Business and Industry pursuant to section 13 of this act the
minutes of its meetings, notices and any other documents prepared
by the Board for public information purposes.
Sec. 114. NRS 642.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
642.110 1. All licenses shall be signed by the [Chair]
President and the Secretary of the Board and attested by the seal of
the Board.
2. Each license shall specify the name of the person to whom
issued. Every license shall be nonassignable and nontransferable,
and shall be displayed by each licensee in a conspicuous place in the
office or place of business of the licensee.
-
*AB601*

– 62 –
Sec. 115. NRS 643.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
643.030 1. [The Board shall elect a President.] No person
may serve as President of the Board for more than 4 consecutive
years.
2. [The Board shall elect a Vice President.
3.] The Board shall [elect a Secretary-Treasurer, who may or
may not be a member of the Board. The Board shall] fix the salary
of the Secretary-Treasurer [,] of the Board, which must not exceed
the sum of $3,600 per year.
[4.] 3. Each officer and member of the Board is entitled to
receive:
(a) A salary of not more than $150 per day, as fixed by the
Board, while engaged in the business of the Board; and
(b) A per diem allowance and travel expenses at a rate fixed by
the Board, while engaged in the business of the Board. The rate
must not exceed the rate provided for state officers and employees
generally.
[5.] 4. While engaged in the business of the Board, each
employee of the Board is entitled to receive a per diem allowance
and travel expenses at a rate fixed by the Board. The rate must not
exceed the rate provided for state officers and employees generally.
[6.] 5. The Secretary-Treasurer shall:
(a) Keep a record of all proceedings of the Board.
(b) Give to this State a bond in the sum of $3,000, with
sufficient sureties, for the faithful performance of his or her duties.
The bond must be approved by the Board.
Sec. 116. NRS 643.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
643.050 1. The Board may:
(a) Maintain offices in as many locations in this State as it finds
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
(b) [Employ] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this
act, employ attorneys, investigators and other professional
consultants and clerical personnel necessary to the discharge of its
duties.
(c) Adopt regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of
this chapter.
2. The Board shall prescribe, by regulation, sanitary
requirements for barbershops and barber schools.
3. Any member of the Board or its agents or assistants may
enter and inspect any barbershop or barber school at any time during
business hours or at any time when the practice of barbering or
instruction in that practice is being carried on.
4. The Board shall keep a record of its proceedings relating to
the issuance, refusal, renewal, suspension and revocation of
licenses. The record must contain the name, place of business and
-
*AB601*

– 63 –
residence of each licensed barber, licensed apprentice and instructor,
and the date and number of the license. The record must be open to
public inspection at all reasonable times.
5. The Board shall place on the Internet website maintained by
the [Board] Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and Councils
Standards of the Department of Business and Industry pursuant to
section 13 of this act the budget of the Board and all financial
reports prepared by the Board.
6. The Board may approve and, by official order, establish the
days and hours when barbershops may remain open for business
whenever agreements fixing such opening and closing hours have
been signed and submitted to the Board by any organized and
representative group of licensed barbers of at least 70 percent of the
licensed barbers of any county. The Board may investigate the
reasonableness and propriety of the hours fixed by such an
agreement, as is conferred by the provisions of this chapter, and the
Board may fix hours for any portion of a county.
7. The Board may adopt regulations governing the conduct of
barber schools and the course of study of barber schools.
Sec. 117. NRS 643.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
643.100 1. Not less than three times each year, at such times
and places as it determines, the Board shall conduct examinations to
determine the fitness of each of the following:
(a) Applicants for licenses as barbers.
(b) Applicants for licenses as apprentices.
(c) Applicants to enter barber schools.
2. The examination of applicants for licenses as barbers and
apprentices must include a practical demonstration and a written and
oral test that must include the subjects usually taught in barber
schools approved by the Board.
3. Not less than 60 days before the date of an examination
described in this section, the Board shall provide notice of the
examination on the Internet website maintained by the [Board.]
Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and Councils Standards of
the Department of Business and Industry pursuant to section 13 of
this act.
Sec. 118. NRS 644A.225 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
644A.225 [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of
this act, the Board may employ inspectors, investigators, advisers,
examiners and clerks and secure the services of attorneys and other
professional consultants, but no part of the compensation of those
persons or reasonable expenses incurred by the Board may be paid
by the State.
-
*AB601*

– 64 –
Sec. 119. NRS 644A.855 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
644A.855 1. If the holder of a license or certificate of
registration to operate a cosmetological establishment or a facility in
which threading is conducted or any other licensee or a holder of a
certificate of registration issued pursuant to this chapter is charged
with or cited for prostitution in violation of NRS 201.353 or
201.354 or any other sexual offense, the appropriate law
enforcement agency shall report the charge or citation to the
Executive Director of the Board. Upon receiving such a report,
the Executive Director shall immediately forward the report to the
Board or the [Chair] President of the Board. The Board must meet
as soon as practicable to consider the report. If the Board finds that
the health, safety or welfare of the public imperatively require
emergency action and issues a cease and desist order, the Executive
Director shall immediately send the cease and desist order by
certified mail to the licensee or holder of the certificate of
registration. The temporary suspension of the license or certificate
of registration is effective immediately after the licensee or holder
of the certificate of registration receives notice of the cease and
desist order and must not exceed 15 business days. The licensee or
holder of the certificate of registration may file a written request for
a hearing to challenge the necessity of the temporary suspension.
The written request must be filed not later than 10 business days
after the date on which the Executive Director mails the cease and
desist order. If the licensee or holder of the certificate of
registration:
(a) Files a timely written request for a hearing, the Board shall
extend the temporary suspension until a hearing is held. The Board
shall hold a hearing and render a final decision regarding the
necessity of the temporary suspension as promptly as is practicable
but not later than 15 business days after the date on which the Board
receives the written request. After holding such a hearing, the
Board may extend the period of the temporary suspension if the
Board finds, for good cause shown, that such action is necessary to
protect the health, safety or welfare of the public pending
proceedings for disciplinary action.
(b) Does not file a timely written request for a hearing and the
Board wants to consider extending the period of the temporary
suspension, the Board shall schedule a hearing and notify the
licensee or holder of the certificate of registration immediately by
certified mail of the date of the hearing. The hearing must be held
and a final decision rendered regarding whether to extend the period
of the temporary suspension as promptly as is practicable but not
later than 15 business days after the date on which the Executive
-
*AB601*

– 65 –
Director mails the cease and desist order. After holding such a
hearing, the Board may extend the period of the temporary
suspension if the Board finds, for good cause shown, that such
action is necessary to protect the health, safety or welfare of the
public pending proceedings for disciplinary action.
2. For purposes of this section, a person is deemed to have
notice of a temporary suspension of his or her license or certificate
of registration:
(a) On the date on which the notice is personally delivered to the
person; or
(b) If the notice is mailed, 3 days after the date on which the
notice is mailed by certified mail to the last known business or
residential address of the person.
Sec. 120. NRS 648.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
648.020 1. The Private Investigator’s Licensing Board,
consisting of five members appointed by the Governor, is hereby
created.
2. The Governor shall appoint:
(a) One member who is a private investigator.
(b) One member who is a private patrol officer.
(c) One member who is a polygraphic examiner.
(d) Two members who are representatives of the general public.
These members must not be:
(1) A licensee; or
(2) The spouse or the parent or child, by blood, marriage or
adoption, of a licensee.
3. [The members of the Board shall elect a Chair of the Board
from among its members by majority vote. After the initial election,
the Chair shall hold office for a term of 2 years beginning on July 1
of each year. If a vacancy occurs in the office of Chair, the members
of the Board shall elect a Chair from among its members for the
remainder of the unexpired term.
4.] Each member of the Board is entitled to receive:
(a) A salary of not more than $150, as fixed by the Board, for
each day or portion of a day during which the member attends a
meeting of the Board; and
(b) A per diem allowance and travel expenses at a rate fixed by
the Board, while engaged in the business of the Board. The rate
must not exceed the rate provided for state officers and employees
generally.
[5.] 4. While engaged in the business of the Board, each
employee of the Board is entitled to receive a per diem allowance
and travel expenses at a rate fixed by the Board. The rate must not
exceed the rate provided for state officers and employees generally.
-
*AB601*

– 66 –
Sec. 121. NRS 648.025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
648.025 1. The Board may:
(a) Employ an Executive Director who:
(1) Is the chief administrative officer of the Board;
(2) Serves at the pleasure of the Board; and
(3) Shall perform such duties as the Board may prescribe;
and
(b) [Employ] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this
act, employ investigators and clerical personnel necessary to carry
out the provisions of this chapter.
2. The Board shall establish the compensation of the Executive
Director.
Sec. 122. NRS 656.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
656.080 1. [Annually the Board shall designate a Chair and a
Vice Chair from its membership.
2.] The Board shall hold such meetings as may be necessary
for the purpose of transacting its business.
[3.] 2. Three members of the Board constitute a quorum to
transact all business, and a majority of those present must concur on
any decision.
Sec. 123. NRS 656.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
656.110 1. The Board shall administer the provisions of this
chapter.
2. The Board may [appoint] :
(a) Appoint such committees as it considers necessary or proper
[, and may employ,] ;
(b) Employ and prescribe the duties of and fix the salary of an
Executive Secretary who may be employed on a part-time or full-
time basis ; [,] and [may]
(c) Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this act, also
employ such other persons as may be necessary.
3. All expenditures described in this section must be paid from
the fees collected under this chapter.
Sec. 124. NRS 656.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
656.260 1. A licensee or certified court reporter shall notify
the [Chair] President or Executive Secretary of the Board in writing
within 30 days after a change in name or address.
2. A licensee shall report any change of:
(a) Ownership or corporate officers of a court reporting firm;
and
(b) The designated representative of the court reporting firm
must be reported to the [Chair] President or Executive Secretary
within 30 days after the change.
3. The Board may suspend or revoke a license or certificate if
the licensee or certified court reporter fails so to notify the Board.
-
*AB601*

– 67 –
Sec. 125. 1. The Department of Business and Industry, in
coordination with the Purchasing Division of the Department of
Administration and the Attorney General, shall conduct an
evaluation of contracts that have been entered into by a professional
or occupational licensing board under the purview of the Office of
Nevada Boards, Commissions and Councils Standards of the
Department of Business and Industry pursuant to NRS 232.8415, as
amended by section 19 of this act, which are in effect on July 1,
2025, to identify any such contracts that are void under existing law.
2. Each professional and occupational licensing board shall
cooperate with any evaluation conducted pursuant to subsection 1
and provide to the Department of Business and Industry any
information requested by the Department in the performance of such
an evaluation.
Sec. 126. The amendatory provisions of this act do not
abrogate or affect the current term of office of any member of a
professional or occupational licensing board or any officer of such a
board who is serving in the term on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 127. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 218D.430
and 218D.435, a committee may vote on this act before the
expiration of the period for the return of a fiscal note in NRS
218D.475. This applies retroactively from and after May 29, 2025.
Sec. 128. 1. Any administrative regulations adopted by an
officer or an agency whose name has been changed or whose
responsibilities have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of
this act to another officer or agency remain in force until amended
by the officer or agency to which the responsibility for the adoption
of the regulations has been transferred.
2. Any contracts or other agreements entered into by an officer
or agency whose name has been changed or whose responsibilities
have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to
another officer or agency are binding upon the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the administration of the provisions of
the contract or other agreement has been transferred. Such contracts
and other agreements may be enforced by the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the enforcement of the provisions of the
contract or other agreement has been transferred.
3. Any action taken by an officer or agency whose name has
been changed or whose responsibilities have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of this act to another officer or agency
remains in effect as if taken by the officer or agency to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of such actions has been
transferred.
Sec. 129. NRS 633.221, 634A.060, 640.035, 641.080,
641A.140 and 644A.215 are hereby repealed.
-
*AB601*

– 68 –
Sec. 130. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
LEADLINES OF REPEALED SECTIONS
633.221 Officers.
634A.060 Officers.
640.035 Election of officers.
641.080 Officers.
641A.140 Officers.
644A.215 Officers.
H
-
*AB601*